(Cite as: 4 Litt. 47,  14 Ky. 47 (Ky.),  1823 WL 1229 (Ky.)) C Court of Appeals of Kentucky. Lapsley v. Brashears and Barr, and E Converso. Oct. 11, 1823. *1 FROM THE GENERAL COURT. THE BILL OF EXCEPTIONS WAS SIGNED BY THE HON. ADAM BEATTY. West Headnotes Execution 161 k 214 161 Execution 161XI Sale 161XI(A) Manner, Conduct, and Validity 161k214 k. Statutory Provisions. Most Cited Cases Statute extending period for payment of execution on judgment was unconstitutional. Constitutional Law 92 k 2668 92 Constitutional Law 92XXII Obligation of Contract 92XXII(A) In General 92k2668 k. What Is a "Contractual Obligation";  Existing Law.  Most Cited Cases (Formerly 92k145) The "obligation" of a contract is the law that binds the party to perform his undertaking. The obligation of a contract consists in the power and efficiency of the law which applies to and enforces performance of the contract, or the payment of an equivalent for nonperformance. The obligation does not inhere and subsist in the contract itself, proprio vigore, but in the law applicable to the contract. Constitutional Law 92 k 2745 92 Constitutional Law 92XXII Obligation of Contract 92XXII(C) Contracts with Non-Governmental Entities 92XXII(C)2 Particular Issues and Applications 92k2745 k. In General. Most Cited  Cases (Formerly 92k169) An alteration by law of a remedy to such extent as to materially affect a right vested under a prior contract is unconstitutional. Constitutional Law 92 k 2773 92 Constitutional Law 92XXII Obligation of Contract 92XXII(C) Contracts with Non-Governmental Entities 92XXII(C)2 Particular Issues and Applications 92k2771 Enforcement of Judgment or  Debt 92k2773 k. Stay of Execution. Most Cited  Cases (Formerly 92k179) Where the statute, at the time a contract is made, provides that defendants, in actions on contracts, may postpone payment of execution on the judgment for three months, by giving bond for its payment within that time, if plaintiff fails to indorse thereon that he will accept payment in commonwealth bank notes, a subsequent statute extending the period for which payment in such cases may be postponed impairs the obligation of contracts, within the prohibition of the federal constitution. HARRISON, BRECKINRIDGE and WICKLIFFE for Lapsley; HAGGIN, BARRY and ROWAN for Brashears. OPINION OF THE COURT, BY JUDGE OWSLEY. Walter Brashears, being indebted by contract to the intestate, William Lapsley, one thousand dollars, the latter brought suit in the Fayette circuit court, and recovered judgment against the former for the amount of his debt, together with interest thereon from the first day of March, 1815, until paid, and costs. A replevin bond is a contract, within the meaning of the clause in the federal constitution, which prohibits states from passing laws impairing the obligation of contracts. Upon this judgment the intestate, William Lapsley, caused a capias ad satisfaciendum to issue, directed to the sheriff of Fayette county, and the sheriff having arrested the said Brashears and delivered him into the custody of the jailer of Fayette county, the said Brashears was permitted the liberty of the prison rules, upon his entering into bond with Robert R. Barr his security, conditioned as required by law. *2 The legal obligation of a contract consists in the legal remedy for enforcing it. Brashears escaped from the rules of the prison, and suit was brought by William Lapsley, upon the bond given for keeping the rules, and in January, 1816, judgment was thereon finally recovered against Brashears and his security, Barr, for one thousand one hundred and twenty-one dollars and eighty cents, besides costs. The word, impairing, in the federal constitution, does not mean destroying, consequently every State law which weakens the obligation of a contract previously made, or renderers it less operative, is a violation of that constitution. After this, William Lapsley departed this life, and administration of his estate was granted to David Lapsley, who thereafter brought a scire facias in the general court, where the judgment in the action upon the bond given for the prison rules had been rendered, and at the January term, 1817, recovered judgment to have execution in his name, as administrator, &c., for the amount of the judgment which had been recovered by the intestate, William Lapsley, and costs. Accordingly, there issued from the clerk's office of the general court, on the 23d of April, 1817, a fieri facias upon the judgment in favor of the administrator, David Lapsley, against the estate of Walter Brashears and Robert R. Barr, directed to the sheriff of Fayette county; and on the 16th of June, 1817, Brashears and Barr, together with E. Warfield their security, executed a replevin bond, conditioned to pay the amount of the execution, interest and costs, to the said David Lapsley, within twelve months from the date thereof, and the sheriff returned upon the fi. fa., "executed and replevied twelve months," and lodged the same, together with the replevin bond, with the clerk of the general court. Making the right to replevy for two years depend on the plaintiff's not endorsing that bank notes will be received, does not render the replevin law constitutional. After the expiration of the twelve months, and on the 15th of August, there issued upon the replevin bond a writ of fieri facias, against the estate of Brashears, Barr and Warfield, directed to the sergeant of the court of appeals upon which the sergeant returned, "stayed by injunction the 28th September, 1818," The injunction was thereafter dissolved, and another writ of fieri facias issued on the 12th of October, 1821, upon the replevin bond, directed to the sheriff of Fayette county, and on the 23d of October, 1822, Brashears, Barr and Warfield, together with Thomas T. Barr, their security, executed another replevin bond, conditioned to pay the amount of the execution, interest and costs, to David Lapsley, within two years from the date thereof; and the sheriff returned, "levied and replevied," and lodged with the clerk the fi. fa. and replevin bond. At the January term of the general court, 1822, David Lapsley, by his counsel, moved the court to quash this latter replevin bond, and the return of the sheriff upon the latter execution; but his motion was overruled, and by bill of exceptions, the facts proved on the motion, were made part of the record. *3 From the decision of the court overruling his motion to quash, each party has appealed to this court. Before we enter on the examination of the questions involved in the decision of the court below, it may not be improper to advert to some of the provisions contained in the act of the legislature of this country, which passed at the session of 1820, prior to the date of the execution which was replevied for two years. The first section of that act provides, that "when any execution shall issue from the clerk of any court, or any justice of the peace, on any judgment or decree in favor of any person or persons, or corporation, heretofore or hereafter obtained, it shall be lawful for the plaintiff or plaintiffs, by themselves, their agent or attorney, to endorse on said execution as follows, viz: "That either notes on the Bank of Kentucky or its branches, or notes on the Bank of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or its branches, may be received by the officer in discharge of the whole of this execution." And in case such endorsement is made, said execution shall be collected or replevied agreeable to the laws in force, allowing three months replevin, without any further stay or replevin, as heretofore allowed by this act." The second section provides, that "when any execution may issue as aforesaid, without an endorsement showing the consent of the plaintiff or plaintiffs to take such bank notes as described in the first section of this act, and the said execution shall be levied on the estate or person of any such defendant or defendants, he, she or they may give bond with approved security to the officer executing the same, to pay the amount of the debt, interest and costs of any such execution, to the plaintiff or plaintiffs, in two years; and the officers of the justice shall be regulated in the taking the said bond and renewing execution thereon, as they are now directed by law, in case of replevin bonds for three months." The ninth section provides, that "in all cases where an execution may or shall issue or be issued upon any replevin bond, recognizance, forthcoming bond, or other bond having the force of a judgment, except upon bonds given for the purchase of property sold under execution or order of sale, unless the plaintiff or plaintiffs shall, in addition to the endorsement that notes on the Bank of Kentucky and its branches will be taken in discharge of said execution, endorse that notes on the Bank of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and its branches, will be received in like manner, the defendant or defendants in such execution or executions, may replevy the same for twelve months." It was under this act, of which the sections cited compose a part, the two years' replevin bond was taken by the sheriff. It is obvious, however, that in taking that bond, the sheriff has not acted in strict conformity to his duty, as prescribed in the act. The execution under which the sheriff acted in taking the bond, issued upon a replevin bond which had been previously given by Brashears, Barr and Warfield, and the ninth section of the act, in terms not to be misunderstood, limits the time of replevin in such a case to one, and not to two years. When the execution issues on a judgment or decree, and is not endorsed, the second section of the act allows the defendant the liberty of replevying two years, and we know that other acts have declared, that replevin bonds shall have the force of judgments. But, we apprehend, it was not intended by the legislature to extend the liberty of replevying two years to defendants who may have previously replevied the same demand; or, in other words, it was not intended to give the defendant to an execution, which issues upon a replevin bond, the liberty of a further replevin of two years, though the replevin bond upon which the execution issues, may possess the force of a judgment. It, in fact, can not have been so intended by the makers of the law, or why, in the ninth section, limit the replevin to one year, when the execution issues upon a replevin bond? *4 Were the act of the sheriff, therefore, tested exclusively by the provisions of the act cited, neither his return upon the execution nor the replevin bond, could be sustained. But the motion of the plaintiff was not predicated upon any department from the requisitions of the act by the sheriff. The difference between one year mentioned in the act and two years expressed in the condition of the replevin bond, was passed over by the plaintiff, and the validity of the bond and sheriff's return, were assailed upon more comprehensive ground. The motion of the plaintiff to quash the sheriff's return and the replevin bond, was based upon the supposed incompetency of the legislature, to enact any law, having for its object the replevying of debts arising under contracts; and the objection to the sheriff's return and the replevin bond, were hypothecated on the idea, that, as respects the plaintiff's demand, the act cited is inoperative, and conferred no authority upon the sheriff to take any replevin bond, or to make a return upon the execution that he had done so. In overruling the motion of the plaintiff, the court below decided in favor of the validity of the act, and whether or not that decision be correct, this court will proceed to enquire. We are not aware that any question of this sort has ever occurred, nor, in fact, could such a question be expected to occur, before the judiciary of any government possessing no written constitution. In such a government, the power of the legislature knows no limit short of its will, and whatever the legislature enacts, continues to be law until altered or repealed by the same power that enacted it. The admirers of such a government may declaim against laws unjust in their nature and oppressive in their operations, and in the heat of their imagination may tell us, that all the laws contrary to reason are void; but subscribing to the opinion that parliament is omnipotent, they are constrained to acknowledge that there exists no power which can control any thing which may be solemnly enacted by the legislature, though the act be contrary to reason, and though it be contrary to the nature of the social compact. But such is not the nature of this government. Kentucky is a member of the American Union, and that Union has a written constitution, which imposes limits to the legislatures of the several states, beyond which none claim a right to pass. In the second section of the seventh article of that constitution, the people of America have declared, that "this constitution, and the laws of the United States which shall be made in pursuance thereof, and all treaties made, or which shall be made under the authority of the United States, shall be the supreme law of the land, and the judges in every state shall be bound thereby, any thing in the constitution or laws of any state to the contrary notwithstanding." Whilst, therefore, this constitution remains unaltered by the same power that adopted it, and so long as the Union of the American States endures, it must be admitted the fundamental law of all the states, and paramount to the legislative acts of any of the states. We might advert to the various adjudications of the supreme court of the United States, in support of the supremacy of the constitution; but the constitution itself contains a declaration of its own supremacy, and whatever is declared by the constitution, can derive no additional force by being repeated by the judiciary. *5 But it is not alone in the constitution of the United States, that we are to look for restrictions upon the power of the legislature of this state. The people of Kentucky have adopted for themselves a written constitution, which also imposes limits on the power of the legislature, and which must be admitted paramount to the acts of the legislature. Beyond those limits prescribed in the constitution, the people have delegated no power to the legislature, and have declared that any act of the legislature transcending those limits, shall be void. Regarding the constitution of the United States as the supreme law of the land, and regarding the constitution of this state as paramount to the acts of the legislature, we are necessarily led, in considering the validity of the act in question, to examine whether, or not, there be any thing contained in either of those constitutions, inhibiting the legislature from passing such an act. If there be not, the legislature must be admitted to have acted within its legitimate sphere, and the validity of the act must be maintained; but if there be, it is incumbent on the court to pronounce the paramount authority of the constitutions, and declare the act inoperative and void. In proceeding with this examination, the court is not unmindful of the solemn obligations which are imposed upon it by the duty of its station. The question is one involving the power of the legislature in relation to a subject upon which it has not for the first time acted, in the passage of the act under consideration, and the many private interests which, it may be supposed, may be affected by the decision, have produced in the court a deep sense of its duty, and induced it to bestow upon the subject all that deliberation and reflection of which it is capable. In the passage of the act, the legislative department of the government, acting, as it is presumed it did, under the conviction of the paramount authority of the constitutions, must be supposed to have entertained the opinion, that no provision contained in either of those constitutions is violated by any thing contained in the act. But it is not in the opinion of the legislature that the court is to search for the true meaning of the constitution. The high respect due from the judiciary to that department of government, should at all times induce the court not to pronounce upon slight conjectures, that the legislature has transcended its power in the enactment of law. But the court is not to adopt the opinion of the legislature upon trust merely. The constitution has made the judiciary an independent and co-ordinate department of the government, and its opinions must be the result of its own reflections and deliberations. Each department, when acting within its proper sphere, must decide for itself upon the constitution; but both must concur in favor of the constitutionality of a law, before that law can be enforced upon the people. But to return to the examination of the question propounded.--Is there any thing in either the constitution of the United States or that of this state, which forbids the passage of the act under consideration? *6 And first, as to the constitution of the United States. The tenth section of the first article of that constitution, declares that "no state shall coin money, emit bills of credit, make any thing but gold or silver coin a tender in payment of debts, pass any bill of attainder, ex post facto law, or law impairing the obligation of contracts." It is the latter clause of this section forbidding any state passing any law impairing the obligation of contracts, that was more particularly urged and relied on in argument, as being incompatible with the act of the legislature in question; and it is to that clause the attention of the court will now be directed. And here it should be borne in mind, that prior to the passage of the act under which the sheriff acted in taking the two years' replevin bond sought in this case to be avoided, Brashears, Robert R. Barr and Warfield had executed their bond, in which they stipulated to pay to the plaintiff, within one year, the amount of an execution which had previously issued against Brashears and Barr, in favor of the plaintiff, upon a judgment recovered by him against them in an action on their bond. It is evident, therefore, that there existed at the passage of the act, a contract between the defendants and plaintiff, and that a contract too, of the description mentioned in the constitution. For in the bond which the defendants had previously given, they expressly agreed to pay the sum therein mentioned to the plaintiff, within one year; and whatever may be the difference in the language employed by different expositors of a contract, they all admit, that an agreement between two or more, concerning something to be done, whereby both parties are bound to each other, or one is bound to the other, is a contract. But admitting such a contract to have existed, before it can be determined whether or not its obligation is impaired by the act of the legislature, we are necessarily led to ask ourselves, what it is that constitutes the obligation of a contract? That man is under an obligation to perform his lawful engagements, is a proposition which none pretends to controvert. Whilst moralists differ, and casuists dispute about the cause of such an obligation, they all agree, that even in a state of nature, man is bound to fulfil his contracts. In such a state, without the aid of civil laws, the obligation addresses itself to the moral faculty, and operates upon the conscience of men; and is denominated the moral obligation of a contract. If, however, such were the only obligation of a contract, the practical effect of the limitation upon the power of the states, contained in the constitution of the United States, could not be distinctly perceived. For although this moral obligation of a contract may exist in a state of civil government, its force is derived from the nature and fitness of things, and could not be impaired by the acts of the legislature, if under no restrictions from the constitution. *7 But in a state of civil government, contracts may derive an additional obligation; an obligation which arises from the civil laws of the government, and which, but for the limitation contained in the constitution, might have been impaired and totally annihilated by the legislatures of the states. This obligation operates through the medium of the sanction of the law, and consists emphatically in those remedies which the law supplies, and may be denominated the legal obligation of a contract. To be under an obligation to do, or not to do a particular thing, necessarily implies coercion of some sort. The coercion may act either internally or externally, internally as in the case of a moral obligation, which operates on the conscience of men; or externally, as in the case of a legal obligation, which operates by the public force, through the instrumentality of remedies prescribed by the civil law. But where there is no legal remedy, how is it possible for there to exist any legal coercion? or if it exists, in what, it may be asked, does it consist? The law may command this to be done, or that to be avoided; but vain and useless would be the command, unless the law also declares, this shall be the consequence of a non-compliance, and remedy be given to enforce it. Without any command from the civil law, man is under a moral obligation to perform his contracts?? and his obligation is of precisely the same sort, still addressing itself alone to his conscience, after the civil law commands a performance, unless, through the instrumentality of remedies furnished by the law, obedience to the command may be enforced. Upon what principle other than that of the legal obligation of contracts consisting in the remedies, is it, that ever since the enactment of the statute against frauds and perjuries, verbal contracts for the sale of lands have been thought to create no legal obligation? That statute no where prohibits the making of contracts of that sort; it barely declares that no action shall be brought to charge any person upon such contracts. Men now possess the same moral power to contract, that was possessed by them before the enactment of that statute, and by parol contracts, may impose upon themselves the same moral necessity to fulfil their contracts; yet inasmuch as all remedy upon contracts of that sort has been taken away by the statute, we are repeatedly told by the most eminent judges, that such contracts produce no legal obligation; or in other words, that such contracts in legal contemplation are void. If, therefore, the obligation of contracts be what we have supposed, the consequence would seem naturally to follow, that as respects the present case, the act of the legislature in question is in conflict with that provision of the constitution of the United States, which forbids any state from passing a law impairing the obligation of contracts. For prior to the passage of that act, as we have already seen, the defendants, Brashears, Robert R. Barr and Warfield, had expressly contracted to pay, within twelve months from the time of contracting, the amount therein mentioned to the plaintiff; and that according to the law then in force, upon their failure to make payment, an execution might have issued upon the bond executed by them, and that under the execution the sheriff would have been bound to permit no further delay, by any additional replevin: Whereas, according to the provisions of the act in question, it was required of the sheriff, when acting under the execution which issued in favor of the plaintiff upon the previous contract, to take from the defendants a replevin bond for the payment of the amount thereof, with interest and costs, within the further time of one year; and that upon the receipt of such a bond, the sheriff was moreover required to return the same, together with the execution, to the office of the clerk from whence the execution emanated, instead of proceeding under the execution to make the money, and pay the same over to the plaintiff, as by the law in force at the date of the previous contract he should have done. *8 But the act in question, it is true, the obligation of the defendants' prior contract has not been entirely destroyed. After the expiration of the replevin allowed by the act, the plaintiff is permitted to sue out an execution, and in possibility might ultimately succeed in coercing the payment of his debt. But during the time of the replevin which is allowed by the act, all pre-existing remedies upon the prior contract, are suspended, and the obligation of that contract thereby weakened and impaired. To be in conflict with the constitution, it is not necessary that the act of the legislature should import an actual destruction of the obligation of contracts; it is sufficient that the act imports an impairment of the obligation. If, by the legislative act, the obligation of contracts be in any degree impaired; or, what is the same thing, if the obligation be weakened, or rendered less operative, the constitution is violated, and the act, so far, inoperative. We know, that the provisions of the act in question, do not imperatively command sheriffs in all cases not to proceed to the collection of the demand contained in any execution, after a replevin bond is tendered to them. The act permits the plaintiff in any execution to endorse thereon, that either notes on the Bank of Kentucky or its branches, or notes on the Bank of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or its branches, may be received by the officer in discharge of the whole of the execution; and when such endorsement is made, the defendant is not allowed to avail himself of the replevin, which in case of no such endorsement being made, is permitted by the act. But if we are correct in supposing that as respects pre-existing contracts, it is incompatible with the constitution for the legislature to pass an unconditional replevin act, surely the condition upon which the replevin allowed by the act in question is made to depend, can not render the act consistent with the constitution. If the validity of the act depended upon the question, it might be deserving consideration, whether or not, if the act would have been otherwise constitutional, the condition upon which the defendants' right to a replevin is made to depend, would not produce a conflict with the constitution, in consequence of its tendency to compel the plaintiff to receive in payment of his debt other currency than that of gold and silver coin. Be that, however, as it may, it is not perceived how it is possible for a condition of that sort to render an act consistent with the constitution, which, without such a condition, would be in collision with that instrument. Notwithstanding the condition, the defendants have, through the operation of the act, by replevying the plaintiff's debt, suspended for the time all pre-existing remedies; and consequently the obligation of the contract must have been as effectually impaired by the act, as it would have been by an act giving an unconditional replevin to the defendants. But in argument we were told, that to prescribe remedies for the redress of injuries, is a subject which falls exclusively within the sphere of legislative discretion, and that in all well regulated governments, those remedies ought to be modified, altered and changed, so as to suit the condition and exigencies of the community; and it was contended that the constitution ought not to be so construed, as to limit the power of the state legislature, in relation to a subject of such vital importance to the welfare of the community. *9 That to prescribe remedies falls within the province of the legislature, is a proposition which will not be controverted by the court; nor does it follow from any thing which we have said, that the legislature may not, according to its discretion, alter and change existing remedies, if by the alteration, the obligation of contracts be not impaired. Ageeable to our notion of what constitutes the obligation of contracts, we acknowledge that as respects remedies upon pre-existing contracts, the constitution of the United States has prescribed limits to the power of the legislatures of the several states. But what should be more naturally expected to be contained in a written constitution, than limitations upon the powers of the different departments of government? And in the written constitution of the American Union, what should be more naturally expected, than limitations upon the power of the legislatures of the different states? One great object to be effected by all written constitutions is, to define with precision and certainty, the power which is in tended either to be reserved to the people, or delegated by them to others; and by suitable barriers, to prevent those invested with authority, from encroaching upon the rights reserved to the people. And if, when deliberating upon the subject of their government, the people of the American Union have thought private rights worthy their notice; if they have thought that such rights deserved to be preserved by an article in their fundamental charter; if in that charter they have solemnly declared that no states should pass any law impairing the obligation of contracts, it is not for this court to question the policy of that declaration, or by an overstrained construction, to render that declaration ineffectual. And unless that declaration imposes limits to the power of the state legislatures, in relation to remedies upon pre-existing contracts, what operation, according to any rational construction, can it possibly have? In argument a distinction was taken between the right and the remedy; and we were told that although the remedy be changed or suspended, the right may remain; and it was contended that the constitution may have an operation to restrain the state legislatures from the enactment of any law impairing the right, without construing it to impose limits to the power of the legislaature in relation to remedies. But if we are correct in making the legal obligation of contracts consist in the remedy which the law affords, it is not perceived how the constitution can have an operation to preserve the right inviolate, unless it be understood to restrict the power of the legislature over the remedy. Though no legal remedy be afforded me, I may, nevertheless, have a right to that which I contracted for with others; but in strict propriety, the right can not be denominated a legal right. It exists in natural justice only, and can neither be diminished nor impaired by the acts of civil legislatures, and needs no constitutional legal provisions to preserve it. But not so as to the legal right. Obligation and right are correlative terms. Whenever there exists a right in one person, there is a corresponding obligation upon some other person or persons; and if there be no legal obligation upon any person, no person can have any corresponding legal right. If, therefore, the legal obligation of contracts consists in the legal remedy, an unlimited control over the remedy, is equivalent to an unlimited control over the right; for in the same proportion as the legal obligation is diminished, suspended or entirely destroyed, by relaxing, suspending, or abolishing the legal remedy, so in the same proportion is the legal right either impaired or destroyed. *10 Hence it is that we are told, that it is a general and indisputable rule, that, "where there is a legal right, there is also a legal remedy, by suit or action at law, whenever that right is invaded," and that "the want of right and the want of remedy is the same thing.--1 Bl. Com. 23; 1 Bac. Ab. title, Actions in general, letter B. But it was again said in argument, that contracts are made by the parties with a view to the remedy which may thereafter be afforded by the legislature; and that the obligation of contracts consists in the remedy, it was urged that the obligation is of the potential sort, depending upon such future change in the remedy, as the legislature may think proper to make. The argument, though specious, is, nevertheless, not solid. It assumes for granted, that which we have been attempting to combat; it assumes the power of the legislature to diminish the force of remedies upon pre-existing contracts, and thence deduces a conclusion favorable to the existence of such a power. But if, as we suppose, the constitution has interdicted the exercise of such a power by the legislature; and if the constitution be the supreme law of the land, it is not to be admitted that contracts are made by parties with a view to the legislature thereafter producing a change in the remedy, contrary to the provisions of the constitution; nor can the obligation of contracts be admitted to depend upon the legislature so doing. But in argument we were referred to two adjudications of this court, both of which, it was contended, go to maintain the power of the legislature to change the remedy upon pre-existing contracts. The first is the case of  Grubbs, &c. v. Harris, 1 Bibb 567, in which it was decided to be competent for the legislature to provide a more summary remedy for the recovery of debts, than existed at the time of making the contracts. The other is the case of  Rearden v. Searcy's heirs, 2 Bibb 202, in which it was decided to be competent for the legislature, after the date of a contract, to subject to its satisfaction, land which was not subject at the date of the contract. There is, however, nothing in either of those cases incompatible with the construction which we think ought to be given to the constitution. According to our construction, it is only where by a change in the remedy the obligation of contracts is impaired, that the constitution is violated; and in neither of those cases was the obligation of contracts impaired by the act of the legislature then under discussion. The change produced in the remedy by each of those acts, was neither less tardy, nor less beneficial to the plaintiff than the pre-existing remedy, and it is impossible to perceive how the obligation of contracts can be impaired by either accelerating the remedy or by making a fund subject to their satisfaction, which was not so when the contracts were made. But again it was said in argument, that if our construction of the constitution prevails, the same system of courts must irrevocably remain, without even being subject to the control of the legislature as to the time of their sessions, contrary to the invariable practice of all the states in the Union. *11 The conclusion is not, however, admitted to follow from the premises assumed. To give the argument any sort of plausibility, the position must first be established, that courts constitute a part of legal remedies. But we deny the correctness of such a position. Courts are erected for the purpose of deciding contested rights, when those rights are drawn in question and brought before them through the instrumentality of remedies prescribed by law; but courts exist independent of those remedies, and, in a legal sense, compose no part of them. To create, alter and abolish courts, and to change their sessions, is a subject which falls properly within the sphere of legislative discretion, and we know of no provision in the constitution which limits the power of the legislature upon that subject, except as to abolishing such courts as the constitution has established; though in exercising that power, private rights may be incidentally affected. But again, in argument we were told, that in actions brought in the courts of this country upon contracts made in other states, the principle has been recognized and repeatedly acted upon, referring to the laws of the state where the contract was made, in giving a decision upon the nature and construction of the contract, whilst, at the same time, as respects the remedy, the laws enacted and in force here, were admitted to govern; and if the obligation of contracts consists in the remedy, it was emphatically asked, why the distinction, and why not advert to the laws of the state where the contract is made, as well for the purpose of ascertaining the remedy, as for the purpose of deciding on the nature and construction of the contract? We answer, that there is nothing in the distinction incompatible with the construction which we have given to the constitution, and that it is taken upon the principles of international law, as it is recognized and acted upon by all civilized states. It is only coextensive with the territorial limits of the state that the civil laws of any state can have any operation; and the obligation which contracts derive from those laws, must necessarily be circumscribed by the same limits. It is, therefore, utterly impossible that an obligation derived from the laws of one state, can be impaired by the laws of any other state. In conformity to the distinction adverted to in argument, we know that the court here refer to the laws of the state where a contract is made, in deciding on its nature and construction; but in doing so they do not proceed upon the notion that the contract brings with it here, the legal obligation which it derived from the laws of the state where it was made. In referring to the laws of the foreign state for that purpose, the courts here acknowledge that all persons are every where under a moral obligation to perform their contracts, and go upon the idea that wherever that moral obligation grows out of a contract conforming to the laws of the state where the contract was made, there is, through the medium of legal remedies prescribed by the laws of this state, a legal force given to that moral obligation. But there is no provision in the constitution of the United States, which requires each state in the Union to give the same legal obligation to contracts made in any state. The constitution, in that respect, has prescribed no limits to the power of the states; and this state, in comformity to the general principle, of comity between states, through the medium of remedies adopted by herself, has communicated to contracts made in other states, a legal obligation, when those contracts conform to the laws of the state where made; and the courts here are, accordingly, governed by those remedies. *12 But in argument?? the validity of the act was finally attempted to be maintained, upon what was contended to be a contemporaneous construction of the constitution, favorable to the power of the legislature to enact such laws. And in support of that construction, we were referred to an act of the legislature of this state, which passed at the session of 1792, allowing replevins upon pre-existing contracts; and also, to an of Congress of the same date, requiring the marshal when acting under any writ of fieri facias, which shall issue from any court of the United States, in causing an appraisement of the defendant's goods in execution, to be governed by the laws of the state, where, by the laws of the state then in force, an appraisement of the defendant's goods taken in execution, was required; and we were, moreover, referred to an act of the Virginia legislature, which passed prior to the adoption of the constitution of the United States, but which was in force at the date of the act of Congress of 1792, requiring estate taken under writs of fieri facias, to be appraised, and authorizing a replevin for twelve months to the defendant, in case the estate would not sell for three fourths of its appraised value. The circumstance of the legislature of Virginia having enacted a replevin law prior to the adoption of the constitution, and not having immediately after the constitution was adopted, repealed that law, affords no convincing evidence of what was the understanding of that body, as to the power of the state legislatures to pass replevin laws, after the constitution had become the fundamental law of the United States. The circumstance of the legislature of that state having enacted such a law prior to the formation of the constitution, may have contributed to induce the framers of the constitution to insert the provision in that instrument which we suppose was intended to prevent the future enactment of such laws; and may not the legislature of Virginia have been influenced to forbear repealing the law from a conviction that the provision of the constitution now under consideration, could have no other than a prospective operation, and not because the members of that body entertained the opinion, that not with-standing the constitution, the legislature still possessed the power to enact replevin laws to operate upon pre-existing contracts? And may not such have been also the construction which the Congress of 1792 put upon the constitution? Or, knowing that the provision of the constitution now under consideration has no application to the power of Congress, may not that body, without intending to express a solemn opinion on the power of the legislatures of the several states to enact replevin laws have thought proper to adopt the laws enacted by the states, as a rule for the government of the marshal whilst acting under the process of the courts of the United States? And after having adopted the laws of Virginia, may not the legislature of Kentucky, of 1792, have entertained the same opinion, as to the construction of the constitution, that we have supposed may have been entertained by the legislature of Virginia; and instead of supposing that no limitations are imposed on the power of the state legislatures, in relation to replevin laws, by the constitution, may not that legislature have thought, that as by the act which it was then enacting, the term of replevin was about to be reduced from twelve months, as allowed by the Virginia act then in force here, to three months only, the provision of the constitution against impairing the obligation of contracts could not be thereby violated, though a contrary opinion might have been entertained, if the term of replevin allowed by the then existing law had been extended? And, without adverting to the peculiar state of the laws of this country when the act of 1792 was enacted may not subsequent legislatures in this state have considered the enactment of that act as a legislattive construction of the constitution; and concluding, as it was natural that they should conclude, that if the legislature is not restricted by the constitution, from passing a replevin law for three months, it is not restricted from passing such laws for one, two, or an hundred years? And, acting under the influence of that precedent, may they not have enacted the various other replevin laws to be found in our statute books, without giving to the constitution that consideration and reflection, which, under different circumstances, it would have received? *13 But, supposing the legislature of Kentucky not to have been influenced by considerations such as we have suggested, and admitting the members of that body to have entertained the opinion that the constitution imposes no limitations on the power of the legislatures of the states, in relation to the enactment of replevin laws, still the constitution remains the same that it was when first adopted by the states; and whatever respect may be entertained for the opinions of the members of the legislative department of the government, the court is nevertheless under the necesity of deciding according to its own conviction of the correct import of the constitution; and the result of that conviction is, that as respects pre-existing contracts, the act under consideration is in conflict with the constitution, and that the sheriff derived no authority under the act, to take the replevin bond and make the return upon the execution now sought to be quashed. Without going into an inquiry as to the constitution of this state, therefore, the judgment of the court below, overruling the motion of the plaintiff to quash the replevin bond and sheriff's return on the execution, must be reversed, and the cause remanded to that court, and judgment there entered in conformity with this opinion. The defendants in that court must pay the costs of both appeals in this court. OCTOBER 11, 1823. OPINION OF JUDGE MILLS, IN THE TWO PRECEDING CASES. The main questions made and debated in these causes, the answer to which may supersede all others, is, does the law of this state, passed on the 25th day of December, in the year 1820, or rather, that part of it which subjects the creditor to a stay of two years, on the debtor's giving bond and security, unless the creditor shall endorse on his execution a willingness to accept notes on the Bank of Kentucky, or Bank of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, violate the tenth section of the first article of the constitution of the United States, which declares that "no state shall pass any bill of attainder, ex post facto law, or law impairing the obligation of contracts." Replevin laws essentially impair the obligation of contracts, and are unconstitutional, when prospective only, as well as when retrospective also. This important and delicate question must now meet with an answer from this court, and it is conceived that the answer can be clearly and satisfactorily given, from the following reasons and considerations: 1st, The meaning of the terms employed in the constitution, applied to the law in question; 2dly, the necessity of inserting such a clause; 3dly, the circumstances under which it was adopted, which pointed out the cases to which it applies; and 4thly, the cotemporaneous exposition of it, and judicial decisions under it. First, the meaning of the terms employed. Three only need be noticed, ""contracts," "obligation," and "impairing." The meaning of the word "contract" is known to every ordinary capacity. It means an engagement or stipulation, whether written or verbal, to do, or not to do, a particular thing, assented to by the person to whom the engagement is made. This is the definition, in substance, of Powell and Newland, two able writers on contracts, of the supreme court of the United States, Sturges v. Crowninshield, 4 Wheat. 122, Dartmouth College v. Woodward, ibid 518 and it is the definition used, not only by dictionaries, but by common sense. It is therefore clear, that every bargain to pay either money or goods, or to perform labor or services, or to abstain from any act, between individuals, or parties able to contract, is within the meaning of the term. As to "obligation," we need not go to the civil law or Roman code, as said in argument, to ascertain its meaning. If we were to resort to that source, we should find the same definition which is easier obtained elsewhere. The word is derived from the Latin word obligotio, tying close up, and from the verb obligo, to bind or tie up, to engage or oblige by the ties of promise, oath or form of law; and obligo is compounded of the verb ligo, to bind or tie fast, and the preposition ob, which is affixed to increase its meaning. This intimates its sense. But here I need not tarry, but will resort to that source for the signification of the word, which is more accessible to, and understood by every ordinary capacity. Our four most approved lexicographers, Johnson, Sheridan, Walker and Jones, all in substance define the word to mean the binding power of any oath, vow, duty or contract; an act which binds any man to some performance. The obligation of a contract is, then, its binding power; it is that which compels its performance; in other words, it is, as defined by the supreme court of the United States,  2 Wheaton 197, "the law of the contract." *14 Now, we know that some contracts are made by law, such as compacts between states and corporations, between two or more states, or treaties with foreign powers. The terms are agreed upon and written in the form of law, which may have no sanction, but which, in their essence, consist of law; and a violation of them not only affects the contract, but breaks the law itself, which is the obligation of the contract. But contracts between individuals, voluntarily made, and abstractly considered, have no law in their composition; but the law of the land says, that they shall be fulfilled, as made, and applies remedy in case of breach; and both these constitute the "obligation." Thus, for a full consideration, I engage to pay money on a particular day; the law, independent of remedy, as well as the words of the contract, says I shall do so it. If I do, I comply, not only with the words of my engagement, but also with the law, and thus fulfill the obligation. If I fail, I violate the obligation, and subject myself to the sanction of the law which was styled remedy. If then the contract was tolerated by law, in its inception, and was such an one as the law said should be binding, and the legislature of a state shall say that it shall not be binding, the act would contravene the constitution; and if they take away the remedy, or so protract it, as to render it useless, the constitution is, in like manner, violated. Any law, therefore, of a state, which declares that legitimate contracts shall not be fulfilled according to their terms, or indirectly reaches the same object, must violate the obligation intended by the constitution. On the meaning of the word obligation, some definitions have been offered in argument, which will be attended to. The distinction has been taken between the moral and legal obligation of a contract. The moral obligation has been said to be that force upon the conscience, which every one feels. This distinction between moral and legal obligation, is well founded, and the definition of moral obligation is correct. But nothing is gained for it; for it cannot be seriously contended, that the moral obligation alone, was in the eye of the convention. Why should they so suspect the morality of the people, as to address to them, in this shape, this moral lesson? Why should they in giving the moral precept, not direct it to each individual, and appeal to his bosom, instead of the states, and indeed to the laws, and not to the moral character of the states? This at once shows that the moral obligation was not the only thing intended to be preserved. But suppose it is conceded that the moral obligation only is intended, what is gained by the concession? The moral sense of the creditor teaches him that the debtor ought to pay; that of the debtor, that he ought to comply. But the law interferes between their two consciences, thus correctly instructed, and imposes upon the creditor the necessity of owning that his moral sense is wrong, and relieves the conscience of the debtor from any compunction on account of non-performance. Could such law be said to have no effect upon the moral obligation of the contract? *15 Again, it has been said that the obligation intended by the constitution, means the confidence reposed by the contracting parties in the government, that redress shall be afforded for a breach; or, in other words, that the potential ability of the government to afford redress of some kind, to be determined by the law, when it is resorted to, is what was intended by the word obligation. I shall now examine this position. Read the constitution according to it, and it will be confuted. "No state shall pass a law impairing the confidence of the citizen, reposed in the government, that it will furnish remedy to enforce contracts;" or, "no state shall pass laws impairing the potential ability or power of government to enforce contracts, of some kind or other!!" What reason had the convention to guard this confidence in government, which the citizens might possess? Was it wise to bind the state to preserve this confidence, and leave them at liberty to furnish either a speedy and convenient, or a slow and lingering remedy, or none at all, at the same moment? Why protect the potential arm of the state governments, to enforce contracts, by the provision in question, when that potential power would exist as well without the provision as with it, and still leave the states at liberty to apply no remedy, or that which was equivalent to none? Such a provision would not have been remarkable for wisdom and sagacity. What is more, yield the definition to be correct, with all its unwise features, and it will be hard still to exempt the law in question. If obligation means the confidence of the creditor that remedy from government will be afforded, does a law which retards or enervates that remedy not weaken or impair that confidence? If the potential ability of government, to afford remedy of some kind, is intended, is that law valid, which removes or extends the application of that potential power from one time to another. even after judgment? The proper answer to these inquiries will show that the definition contended for will not escape the effect of the constitution. Again, it has been contended, that the words, "impairing the obligation of contracts," are a redundant mode of expression, and mean nothing more than the expressions, "impairing contracts," used in our own constitution; and therefore, if part of the amount of the contract is not taken away by the law, it is not impaired, whether the remedy be or be not retarded or denied. I am not disposed to admit this construction. A contract between individuals, as before illustrated, may be spoken of in the abstract, as a simple idea, without including the compound idea of the law blended with it; and the word, obligation, was inserted to prevent this, and to express, include and preserve the binding power attached to the contract, that is, the law, and to remove the doubt and avoid the effect of construction; and thus it cannot be contended that the contract being left entire, the constitution is not infringed, although the law has left the contract unregarded, without remedy. But this construction, however, is as vulnerable as the former, even if its correctness be admitted. If the law is not intended in the expressions, "impairing contracts," the clause does nothing at all. A contract, in its simple form, unconnected with the law which operates upon it, if ever made, is a fact that will exist, whether the law notices it or not. If government should say there should be no remedy to enforce it, or that it should be enforced partially, or by half, or any other proportion, still the fact would exist, that there was such a contract, and all the powers of legislation could not blot it from existence. A prohibition, then, not to pass laws "impairing contracts," if construed to embrace only contracts, without the law of contracts, would be a prohibition restraining the legislature from doing what they never could do, and would of course be nugatory. This simple expression, then, "impairing contracts," leaving out the word obligation, must have relation to, and include the law of contracts, or mean nothing. It was and is well known, that there are many contracts which the laws of no government can or ought to enforce. Such are counted void, and are not noticed as contracts in legal parlance. It is not every contract to which government extends its aid. For instance, an executory agreement made by one citizen to lend to another, in common parlance, is a contract; yet if the lender refuses to fulfil it, the law affords no aid. Gaming and usurious contracts, and contracts against morality or the policy of the state, and all those which are forbidden by law, in their inception, are contracts, in common parlance, according to the simple idea of the term; but yet they are not legal contracts, and could not be intended to be secured by either our own, or the constitution of the United States. It, must, therefore, be those that include the compound idea of law with them, which alone were intended by the constitution of this state. *16 The word "impair," is familiar to every one, and means, according to the same standard writers in our language, before quoted, by which we teach our children in our own tongue, simply "to diminish, to injure, to make worse," &c. It is remarkable that the convention did not use the term "lessen, or increase, or destroy;" but one more comprehensive, which prohibited the states, even without altering, lessening or increasing, from making worse in any respect, a contract legitimate in its creation. The object, then, of this provision, must have been to establish an important principle, and that was, the entire inviolability of contracts. The inquiry, then, must be, with regard to every law affecting contracts, or operating upon either right or remedy, does it lessen the value of the contract, or in any measure render it worse? If it does, that law is repugnant to that clause of the constitution in question. Does the present law do this? Without the law, the debtor would be bound to make present payment; by the law, without the assent of the creditor, he has two years, then paying only the same sum with its interest, and the creditor only receives further assurance by the security given, that, in the meantime, the debt shall not be lost. Is the money paid down, of the same value with that sum paid two years hence? or, is a contract now to be certainly coerced, worth no more than that to be coerced two years hence? If brought into the market, will they command equal value? Common sense must answer these questions in the negative. It, therefore, follows, that the present law is unconstitutional, and cannot be sustained. I shall now proceed to the second consideration, viz. the necessity of such a clause in the constitution. Anterior to the constitution, the states could violate or impair contracts. The states were then, and are now, evidently commercial. Debt is the offspring of commerce. If promptly paid, it is the life of commerce; if delayed, commerce languishes. Permit the three states of Massachusetts, New York and Pennsylvania, to contract what debts with foreign countries they please, and then by the interposition of their legislatures to retard the payment of these debts; say these debts are due to Great Britain, our ancient enemy, whose existence depends upon commerce and upon punctual payment; how could there be a more certain and better cause of hostility, than such a procedure? Thus, these states would embroil the remaining twenty-one, and the whole may be disturbed by the acts of a small portion. Again, it was foreseen that the states must be drawn together in a closer bond of union and intercourse, than foreign governments could be to each other. All their dealings must be upon terms of mutual reciprocity. If this was not the case, how could the Union exist? If one was to become the debtor of another, and then by its municipal regulations, restrain the collection of that debt, would not offense, retaliation and quarrels between state and state, be the inevitable consequence? Indeed, in our own code of 1815, there is a retaliatory provision, which directs the court that renders judgment in favor of a citizen of another state, to enquire whether the collection of debts were suspended by the laws of that state to which he belonged, and if the fact was found to be so, to enter a positive stay for a year, whether he would accept paper or not. It is impossible to conceive, how far such measures, in a state of irritation, might be carried, and how speedily the Union might be marred or dissolved by the exercise of such a power. Moreover, our revenue depends on our duties on foreign merchandise, and perhaps three-fourths of it is collected from the three states named, and, of course is blended with private debt. Allow these states to shut their banks, suspend law process, and restrain the fulfilment of contracts, on which the greatest portion of the revenue of the Union depends, it would vitally cut the sinews of government, and mar the peace of the whole. These were the portending evils of the day, anterior to the constitution; and realizing these with others, the worthy patriots who formed the constitution, inserted these respective clauses, which operate on the present controversy. We will see that these dangers are not imaginary, but real, when we now attend to the third consideration proposed, and that is, the circumstances under which this clause, with the rest of the constitution, was adopted. *17 This involves the history of the United States, between the year 1783 when the peace was adopted, and the year 1789, when the constitution took effect, a period of six years. From this period, I shall collect some prominent evils, which evidently caused this contested provision. According to the usual rule of attending to the old state of things, the mischief and the remedy, we will be enabled to ascertain the design and extent of that remedy. At the commencement of the revolution, our merchants were deeply indebted to the merchants of Great Britain. These debts, by an uncontrollable necessity, were suspended during the war; but at the peace of 1783, they were revived by the terms of the treaty. That treaty found nearly all the states with laws in force, which suspended the collection of debts, or provided for their payment in property, or made them dischargeable in paper money. The effect of these laws, directly operated upon the British creditors, and they became clamorous to their government. Great Britain, to retaliate, refused to surrender, according to treaty, the posts within our boundaries, and supported the hostile acts of the savages, to the annoyance of our frontiers. When John Adams was sent as minister to that court in 1785, to complain of these grievances, he received promptly for answer, that the states had violated the treaty, by suspending the collection of debts.--See Ramsay's United States, 3 vol. page 177; Ram. Life of Washington 259. Our minister failed in the negotiation and returned home, and the matter was never accommodated until long afterwards, during the administration of Washington, under the constitution. What is more at the conclusion of the peace large quantities of merchandise were imported, and new debts created, trusting to the supposed affluent times of the peace, for payment. This prospect failed, and in consequence of it; the states, or a number of them, after the peace, passed new laws, interfering between debtor and creditor, and delayed collection.--See Marshall's Life of Washington, vol. 5, page 75. This increased the difficulty between this country and our ancient enemy, and called forth the censures of the father of his country, Washington, then in retirement at Mount Vernon. In one letter to a member of Congress, he observes: "It was impolitic and unfortunate, if not unjust, in those states, to pass laws, which, by fair construction, could be considered as infractions of the treaty of peace. It is good policy, at all times, to put one's adversary in the wrong. Had we observed good faith, and the western posts had been withheld from us by Great Britain, we might have appealed to God and man for justice." To another member he says: "What a misfortune it is, that the British should have so well grounded a pretext for their palpable infractions, and what a disgraceful part, out of the choice of difficulties before us, are we to act."--See Ramsay's Wash. 259. A list of these laws was collected by Mr. Hammond, the British Minister, and presented to the Secretary of State, Mr. Jefferson, as a list of grievances, and will be found in 1 State Papers 252, and amount in number to twenty-one. Of these, it will be sufficient to notice only those passed after the peace. Virginia in December, 1783, revived her law suspending the emanation of executions, and allowed real and personal estate to be tendered in discharge of executions. In 1787, she removed this obstruction, or rather, substituted in its place a suspension by replevin, for one year. South-Carolina, in 1784, suspended the recovery of all debts for nine months, and then made them recoverable at four equal annual instalments, after the debt was replevied; and in 1787, that state extended the instalments, in some cases, of debts replevied, one year longer. Rhode Island, in 1788, made her debts payable in paper money, or delivery of property; New York did the same thing and provided a fund of paper money to be loaned on credit for that purpose. Georgia passed acts of the same nature. The rest of the states, or a number of them, had their suspension acts of the war still in force, as will appear by the correspondence between Jefferson and Hammond.--State Papers, vol. 1, from page 296 to 327. But the infraction of the British treaty by these laws, was not the only evil under which this country labored. A short extract abridged and selected in the language of Marshall, in his Life of Washington (pages 85 to 88), will suffice. *18 "The discontents and uneasiness, arising in a great measure from the embarrassment in which a great number of individuals were involved, continued to become more extensive. At length two great parties were formed in every state, which were distinctly marked, and which pursued distinct objects with systematic arrangement. The one struggled with unabated zeal, for the exact observance of public and private engagements. The distresses of individuals were, they thought, to be only alleviated by industry and frugality, not by a relaxation of the laws, or a sacrifice of tthe rights of others. The other party marked out for itself a more indulgent course. Viewing with extreme tenderness the case of the debtor, their efforts were unceasingly directed to his relief. To exact a faithful compliance with contracts, was, in their opinion, a measure too harsh to be insisted on, and was one which the people would not bear. They were uniformly in favor of relaxing the administration of justice and of affording facilities for the payment of debts, or of suspending their collection, and of remitting taxes. In many states, the parties last mentioned, constituted a decided majority of the people, and in all of them it was very powerful. The emission of paper money, the delay of legal proceedings, and the suspension of the collection of taxes, where the fruits of their rule, wherever they were completely dominant." The same author speaks of the contests and alternate victories of those parties, and then proceeds to observe: "This uncertainty with respect to measures of great importance to every member of the community; from this instability in principles, which ought, if possible, to be rendered immutable, proceeded a train of ills, and is seriously believed to have been among the operating causes of those pecuniary embarrassments, which at that time were so general, as to influence the legislation of almost every state in the Union. Its direct consequence, was, the loss of confidence in the government and in individuals." After detailing the ills of this state of things more fully, the same author adds, page 87: "The prospect of extricating the country from these embarrassments, was by no means flattering; whilst every thing else fluctuated, some of the causes which produced this calamitous state of things were permanent. The hope and fear still remained, that the debtor party would obtain the victory at the elections; and instead of making the painful effort to obtain relief by industry and economy, many rested all their hopes on legislative interference. The mass of national labor and of wealth, was consequently diminished. In every quarter were found, those who asserted it to be impossible for the people to pay their public or private debts; and in some instances, threats were uttered of suspending the administration of justice by private violence. These threats were absolutely executed in the state of Massachusetts, which occasioned the famous insurrection in that state. The same author, in describing the object of these insurgents, in page 112, say: "Their hostility was principally directed against the compensation promised to the officers of the army, against taxes and against the administration of justice, and the circulation of a depreciated currency was required, as a relief from the pressure of public and private burdens, which had become, it was alleged, too heavy to be borne." Col. Humphreys, of that state, to whom General Washington had written, to know the cause of these disturbances, says in reply: "It rather appears to me that there is a licentious spirit prevailing among the people; a levelling principle; a desire to change; and a wish to annihilate all debts, public and private." Col. Lee, then a member of Congress, and formerly an active and distinguished revolutionist, in describing the same insurrection, says, in a letter to Washington: "Some of the leaders avow the subversion of government to be their object, together with the abolition of debts, the division of property, or a re-union with Great Britain. In all the eastern states, the same temper prevails more or less, and will certainly break forth whenever the opportune moment may arrive." *19 To oppose this insurrection, the sword was drawn, and civil war commenced; and after citizen had spilled the blood of citizen, the governmental army, with General Lincoln at their head, were successful in dispersing the insurgents. Ramsay, in his History of the United States, more summarily details the same facts, and says, in page 77, vol. 3: "State legislatures, in too many instances, yielded to the necessities of their constituents, and passed laws by which creditors were compelled to either wait for payment of their just demands, on the tender of security, or to take property at a valuation, or paper money, falsely purporting to be the representative of specie." Fisher Ames, an advocate of the constitution in his own state, and a member of the first Congress under it, some years afterwards, in his funeral oration on the death of Washington, draws a lively portrait of the gloomy times which succeded the peace, and preceded the constitution, in the following terms: "The system called justice, was, in some of the states, iniquity reduced to elementary principles, and the public tranquillity was such a portentous calm, as rings in deep caverns before the explosion of an earthquake. It was scarcely possible that such governments should not be agitated by parties, and that prevailing parties should not be vindictive and unjust. Accordingly, in some of the states, creditors were treated as outlaws; bankrupts were armed with legal authority to be prosecutors; and by the shock of all confidence and faith, society was shaken to its foundation. The peace of America then hung by a thread, and factions were already sharpening their weapons to cut it." Such is the drawing of that sable cloud which then overhung the prospects of America, and such the facts and the history of the laws interfering between debtor and creditor, as recorded by the pen of the historian and described by the tongue of the orator; by those historians who saw the gloomy interval, and from whom we and our posterity must learn the events of that day, and in whose testimony we are bound implicity to confide. Now it may be asked, at what system of legislation then practiced by the states, did the clause of the constitution in question strike? All the mischiefs of that day have their remedy in that instrument, and against the injury done to, or interference with contracts, was this clause peculiarly directed. If this was not intended, it will be difficult to say what other part of the instrument is. The conclusion is, therefore, irresistible, that the convention did intend to retain the states from the suspension of contracts, and that such laws are forbidden. We were told in argument, that the states, at this period, were in the habit of repealing and annulling contracts, at least in the time of the war, and to restrain this was the object. But in the history of that day, no such practice is discovered. Debts were often confiscated, and the amount directed to be paid to the treasury of the different states; but no instance is found of a general release of debt. Of course, suspension, delay and commutation of debts for articles not called for in the contracts, must have been designed. *20 The fifth consideration proposed, will corroborate this conclusion. It was the cotemporaneous exposition of the constitution. The interference between debtor and creditor was then believed to be cut off, as will be evident from the following testimonies. Luther Martin, a member of the convention, who opposed the constitution, assigned to his constituents as one of the reasons of his opposition, that it prevented the interposition of the states between debtor and creditor, for the purpose of relieving from the pressure of debts, however great it might be, and refers to this clause, as the one so operating, in his apology read at the bar in the argument of this cause. During the period which intervened between the formation of the federal constitution and its adoption by the states, the letters of "Publius," made their appearance in the prints. Their design was to explain the constitution, and recommend its adoption. They were the production of Hamilton, Jay and Madison, and have since been republished and still exist, composing the well known volume entitled "The Federalist." They are admitted on all hands to be the best comment on the constitution ever written, and are taken as high authority throughout the Union, and ought to be read by every American who wishes to understand the constitution. They claim additional weight, because they are the work of three distinguished citizens, who aided in framing the constitution. In commenting on the clause now in question, they clearly show that the extremes to which some of the states had proceeded, in interfering between debtor and creditor, was the occasion of inserting this clause, and that to restrain such interference, was the design and the true construction. When enumerating, in the 7th number, the probable causes of war, which might arise between the states, if they contained to exist without the constitution, Mr. Hamilton says: "Laws in violation of private contracts, as they amount to aggressions on the rights of those states whose citizens are injured by them, may be considered as another probable source of hostility. We are not authorized to expect that a more liberal or more equitable spirit would preside over the legislation of the individual states hereafter, if unrestrained by any additional check, than we have heretofore seen, in too many instances, disgracing their several codes. We have observed the disposition to retaliation excited in Connecticut, in consequence of the enormities perpetrated by the legislature of Rhode Island; and we may reasonably infer, that in similar cases, under other circumstances, a war, not of parchment, but of the sword, would chastise such atrocious breaches of moral obligation and social justice." In the 44th number, Mr. Madison, when commenting on this very disputed clause, says, "bills of attainder, ex post facto laws, and laws impairing the obligation of contracts, are contrary to the first principles of the social compact, and to every principle of sound legislation. The two former are expressly prohibited by the declarations prefixed to some of the state constitutions, and all of them are prohibited by the spirit and scope of these fundamental charters. Our own experience has taught us, nevertheless, that additional fences against these dangers ought not to be omitted. Very properly, therefore, have the convention added this constitutional bulwark in favor of personal security and private rights, and I am much deceived, if they have not, in so doing, as faithfully consulted the genuine sentiments, as the undoubted interests of their constituents. The sober people of America are weary of the fluctuating policy which has directed the public counsels. They have seen, with regret and with indignation, that sudden changes and legislative interferences, in cases affecting personal rights, become jobs in the hands of the enterprising and influential speculators, and snares to the more industrious and less informed part of the community. They have seen, too, that one legislative interference is but the link of a long chain of repetitions; every subsequent interference being naturally produced by the effects of the preceding. They very rightly infer, therefore, that some thorough reform is wanting, which will banish speculation on public measures, inspire a general prudence and industry and give a regular course to the business of society." *21 In accordance with this construction, the effect of the adoption of the federal constitution was, an abandonment by nearly all the states, of these laws of delay and interference between debtor and creditor. Virginia, it is true, did not entirely destroy her replevin system, until 1795. But she did not continue it undisturbed; for Judge Tuckett tells us, that the system fell, "after a hard struggle for many different sessions." See 3 Tuck. Black. 422. It is also worthy of remark, that the same author admits that this clause of the constitution was inserted to operate upon the laws of the several states, interfering between debtor and creditor. Kentucky became a state three years after the adoption of the federal constitution, and in less than eight months after her first existence, she destroyed her replevin system on future contracts. See 1 Litt. L. K. 137. This system was not revived until 1799. See 2 Litt. L. K. 334. So that the first seven years of the existence of Kentucky were passed in obedience to this construction of the constitution. We are also told, that very soon after the state of Rhode Island adopted the federal constitution, Chief Justice Jay, during perhaps his first circuit, decided against a law of that state, which granted a debtor an indulgence for a certain number of years, against the payment of his debts, and declared it an infraction of this clause; and from that time such applications to the legislature ceased.  4 Wheat. 137. We may also here add the construction of Ramsay, the historian, as well as his testimony to the effect of this clause. In the 24th, 25th and 26th pages of the third volume of his History of the United States, he decisively gives to the clause in question the construction now contended for, and records the fact, that it was contended at its adoption, that this restraint ought to be imposed on the legislatures of the different states; that is, to prevent their interference. That such was the effect of the constitution upon the several states, and that it did restore public and private confidence, is also attested by Fisher Ames, in his same eloquent eulogy of Washington before quoted. To this collection of authority may now be added those of a more modern date. During the late war, the legislature of North Carolina passed a law suspending the execution of judgments for a limited period, upon the debtor's giving bond and security to pay the debt; and the supreme court of that state decided this law unconstitutional and void. Such have been the recent decisions of the supreme courts of Tennessee and Missouri; and, it may be added, such is strongly intimated as the opinion of the supreme court of the United States, in the case before cited, of Sturges v. Crowninshield. The question in that case was the validity of a bankrupt law of New York, which released the debtor on the payment of part, in case of a general insolvency, from the payment of the residue. The counsel contended, that the clause now in question did not embrace such a case, but was intended to operate upon the suspension and instalment laws then in force. The court in reply to this argument, impliedly, but clearly admits that such was its intention and operation; but decided that it extended further, and precluded the state from releasing part of the demand. *22 These, with many other opinions of learned and eminent counsel and statesmen, go strongly to corroborate the opinion now given. Indeed, the weight of authority is so great, that bold must be the judge, who could stem the torrent and decide against it. He must say that the convention did not do what they intended, and that the uniform construction and understanding of our best patriots, who adopted it, was mistaken. It was well observed at the bar, that no instance, except of some subordinate tribunals in Kentucky, of a judicial decision otherwise could be produced. I have attempted to show that such a clause was necessary, that its meaning is clear, and that its cotemporaneous construction was uniform at that day, both by the statesman, the historian, and the judge and shall now attend to some of the arguments and objections urged against it at the bar. It has been insisted, that a judgment extinguishes a contract, as was decided by the court of King's Bench, in Biddleson v. Whytel, 3 Burr, 1548, and of course no modification of remedy after judgment, could be said to impair the contract. This is applying technical logic to defeat a constitutional provision. If it was sound, it would inevitably overturn the decision of the supreme court in the case of Sturges v. Crowninshield; for if a judgment upon a contract extinguishes it, in the sense contended for, then the legislature of every state is at liberty to release every contract, after it is once ascertained and defined by judgment. It is evident, that the decision in that case means no more than that after judgment is once obtained on a contract, no new action can be brought on the same contract. The plaintiff must proceed on and by his judgment, and not be allowed to maintain divers suits for the same cause of action. In other words, he had one remedy, and no more, to enforce the same contract, and when this was exhausted, the contract might be said, in this sense, to be extinguished. But it would be preposterous, to contend that a contract, in other respects, is not equally, if not more forcible after judgment, than before. It has been urged, that every government ought to be at liberty to legislate suitably to the exigencies and manners of the citizens composing it; that this restraint on the states prevents this course of legislation, and therefore could not have been intended; and, therefore, such construction, restraining the states, ought not to be adopted. Indeed, it has been urged, that if such is the meaning of this clause of the constitution, it was silently and surreptitiously obtained from the states, and can never be borne by them. To this I reply, that if the clause in question shall be found injurious to the states, the constitution points out the remedy by peaceable amendment, when experience evinces the necessity. But I have yet to learn, that it is essential to the well-being of society, to interfere with, and impair private rights, acquired by legitimate contracts, or that such practice will conduce to the happiness of the republic. This clause was not passed in silence, as we have already seen. It was understood and explained by the ablest advocates of the constitution, before its final adoption, and was the offspring of a conviction, then impressed upon the minds of the people by experience, that such a course of legislation would mar the harmony of the confederation, and blot out both private and public confidence from the minds of the citizens. *23 It has been urged, that this court ought not to pioneer the way, in surrendering the rights of the state; that the supreme court, or the government of the nation, ought to claim this restriction, before we surrender it, and that it rather behooves this court to stand in the gap and resist the encroachments of the federal judiciary, which are likely to absorb state powers. It would have been more pleasant, to have met this question after it had been decided by the supreme court, as it is one measurably of a national character. But as we meet it first, we must decide it. No motive can exist with any member of this bench, to surrender state rights; and I can not wound my conscience, or suppress my fixed convictions, for fear the supreme court may go too far. Besides, the government of the Union is not foreign; it belongs to the people of the nation; to us, as part, and the oath of office imposed on every judge, bids him to support that constitution, and that in turn expressly charges him to disregard any and every thing in the laws or constitution of his state, whivh contravenes that constitution. Although there are some decisions of the supreme court which I could wish were otherwise, yet I do not perceive the dangers of encroachment and usurpation, so loudly sounded; and until I do, I can not be foremost in volunteering in opposition to a government, the most happy and just known to the world. Besides, I can not conceive that this question is untouched by the supreme court. The clause in question has often been before that tribunal, and no case directly in point has been decided by it; but the principles already adopted by that court, when carried out, lead directly to the conclusion now contended for, Of course I do not consider the question as new, or that rights are surrendered by this determination, which have never been claimed. A long and continued system of legislation on this subject, has been pressed upon the court as decisive proof that the law in question is constitutional; and it has been urged, that the practice of interfering between debtor and creditor, has been long sanctioned and acquiesced in by every department of the national government, and this authority ought to conclude the question. It is readily admitted, that an exposition of the constitution deliberately established by successive legislative acts, ought not to belightly disregarded, and that it affords a precedent of high authority. Every time a court is required to decide on the validity of a law when tested by the constitution, the delicacy and importance of the question must be deeply felt, and all judges must wish for relief from so unpleasant a duty; but still it is not admitted that legislative sanction, however frequently given, is conclusive. If so, no system of usurpation which arose and grew by legislative aberrations, could ever be resisted. In this case, however, the legislative sanction is not so strong as has been contended. It is true, Virginia did introduce and retain it from the year, 1748. This she had a right to do, until 1789; for her own constitution imposed no restrictions on her legislative power in this respect. Of course her practice proves nothing, until that period, and after that she soon questioned the practice, and the system fell. Kentucky, as we have seen, for seven years abandoned the system; and since she resumed it in 1799, the longest period of acquiescence in the practice under the constitution of the Union, is afforded. Still, however, it has been a bare acquiescence. The replevin for three months has been so short, that all chose rather to bear than to question it; and longer replevin, until of recent days, has been temporary only. As to the approbation of this practice among the states by the different departments of the United States' government, the instances are not clear and unequivocal. It is true, at different periods, congress have passed laws adopting for the federal courts the execution laws of the respective states, as a guide to the national courts. It is, however, equally true, that that body has ever viewed the subject of a general execution law for the federal courts of original jurisdiction, as one for great delicacy. Even the influence of General Washington, who more than once pressed that subject upon them in his messages, as will be seen by examining the first volume of State Papers, could not prevail upon them to adopt a general and uniform system. They chose rather to temporise with the subject, and to adopt temporary provisions incorporating the state codes. In one of these acts, it is true, reference is made to valuation or appraisement laws, now vulgarly styled property laws. This act, however, was temporary only, and the kind of property laws then adopted were rather submitted to, than sanctioned. As to the federal judiciary their sanction is still wanting. It is true, a silent practice in the federal courts of this country, fluctuating with the state code, has been shown, and one decision of the federal circuit court has been produced, approving of the practice of replevin; but this decision has since been questioned by the same tribunal, and on a division of that court the question has been adjourned to the supreme court. *24 It has also been contended, that either the law under which the contract was made, must govern the remedy, until it be effectuated, or that the clause in question prohibits all interference with the remedy, in relation to any contract made either before or after the making of the contract, if this clause is to have any effect upon the legislation of the states on this subject. If the former, it is insisted that there is, and has been such a constant succession of numerous contracts, that the appearance of each in court must resuscitate from the tomb, the peculiar remedy under which it was made; that the executive officers must be made conversant with numerous laws long repealed, or have their directions given them on each execution; and more than all, contracts made abroad, or in other states, must also introduce with them their peculiar remedies, and thus various foreign laws must be here introduced without our consent. If the latter is the effect of the construction contended for, it is urged, that as the states have the power of granting remedy, without which there would be none, and also of repealing ad libitum, that of course it will follow that those who seek to enforce contracts, must take such as is offered by the state, with as many years' replevin as each state shall choose to impose, or be driven to the alternative of no law at all to enforce any contract, and of course the clause in question can not operate as is now alleged; or if the suspension law, now questioned, shall be decided unconstitutional, no remedy will be found whereby the debt can be enforced, the old one being repealed. This argument presents the greatest difficulty in the contest, and its solution requires more strict attention. If every contract is to carry along with it the particular remedy under which it was made, and officers holding executions should be bound to notice all, it would not militate against the construction now given. The inconvenience or evil, if any, would not arise from the provision in question, and could not be attributed to the constitution, but to the numerous changes in legislation adopted by the state with regard to executions, which are not so many in number here, and will not be presumed numerous in a future day. But if they were numerous, the evil would be occasioned by frequent and unnecessary legislation subsequent to the constitution, which could not alter its meaning or vary its construction. As to contracts made in other countries, it was known to the convention that they must be collected by the remedial laws of the state where the suit was brought; and it was to secure to them a facile and speedy remedy, that the clause in question was adopted. To suppose that they would find a remedy in the state to which they pursued the debtor, which delayed their recovery until their value was lessened, would be supposing that some of the states, where suit was brought, would violate the constitution, which could not be presumed. *25 But I need not take up more time in answering the inconveniences and absurdities resulting from resuscitating, with the appearance of every contract, the remedy under which it was made; for it will be seen that I do not adopt the construction of the constitution, that obligation means remedy only, and that the remedy under which a contract was made, attaches to, and so incorporates itself with it, that the same remedy must be used to enforce it. In this respect, I differ in opinion from my brethren, though I concur in the judgments just rendered, so far as they go. I conceive that it was the design of the clause in question, to establish a national principle, and to impose an obligation upon all the states to give free course to the coercion of contracts, whether past, present, or future. It was known, that one state, by imposing restraints on either right or remedy, might shut up its doors to commerce, exclude other states and other countries from their traffic, and relying on its own resources, or feeling the effects of pressure or irritation, might thus place itself in a state of embargo, until alienation of feeling and indisposition to commercial intercourse, might excite civil hostility or foreign war; and to prevent this, was the design, and it could not be effectuated, unless all contracts were embraced. I, therefore, conceive that the clause in question embraces all laws touching either right or remedy, which render contracts, legal in their origin, of less value, whether they operate upon those made before, or those made after its passage. Laws impairing the obligation of contracts are forbidden, without discriminating between their retrospective or prospective operation. The question is, do they bear on the forbidden subject? It may even be plausibly asserted, that remedy does not depend solely on the legislation of the states. It existed at common law, which was embraced, in this respect, by all the states; and it may be insisted that this clause of the constitution has the effect of a national engagement, or compact, that it shall never cease. But, without being understood as expressing any opinion on this point, or yet as deciding that courts or sheriffs would be at liberty to resort to the most reasonable and convenient antecedent remedies, still I contend that there would be no difficulty in executing judgments on contracts, under the law now in question. After all the delays directed by it are over, then, by the same law, the execution, seizure and sale are directed, without further stay. There is at last an end, when the judgment must be executed. This part of the act is not unconstitutional. What part, then is? I answer, that part which directs the positive stay, without the consent of the plaintiff, between judgment and this final execution. This part the officer ought to disregard. The act, by permitting the execution finally to go, after so long procrastination succeeding the judgment, tacitly, but strongly admits that this delay is not necessary for the purpose of making the money, but barely to give a respite to the debtor, contrary to, and to the injury of his contract. Let this be expunged from the act, and let the officer proceed with the first execution as he is directed to do with the last, and he will then have complete remedy, disregarding all that is unconstitutional in the act. *26 It has been insisted that time must be, and is given, between the commencement of suit and judgment; between judgment and the emanation of execution, and then from that emanation to the return day; that these times are left to the judgment of the legislature, and may be protracted by them at pleasure. For instance, intervals between the terms of courts, may be extended; suits may be directed to be tried one or more terms after the return of original process; executions may be fixed to longer returns; that in commercial cities, the sound of the auctioneer's bell or voice, may be sufficient to convoke the bidders in an hour, while in a sparse population, in a new country weeks may be required to give sufficient notice; that these times must be fixed as long and short as the legislature pleases, indeed may be extended as long as a replevin law, and, therefore, the legislature may take the same time by a replevin law at once. To this it may be replied, that the time given before judgment, is for the purpose of deliberation and preparation; and the time after judgment, for a reasonable allowance to executive officers, to perform their duty. Long enough for these purposes is necessary; longer would be an abuse of power, which might indirectly infringe the constitution, and this might possibly happen without any adequate remedy, coming from a court; for courts do not and can not push the wheels of government along when they make an unconstitutional stop, but only refuse to execute the laws, when they direct unconstitutional acts to be done. But will it thence follow, that because the states can violate the constitution without redress, that, therefore, the violation does not exist? Certainly not. The violation would be as palpable without remedy as with it. It is true, it might be difficult to decide how many days given between the emanation and return of the execution, would or would not be an infraction of the constitution; but still this requisite nicety, would not prove that there could not be an infraction in the longest number of days possible. We do not doubt the existence of light at noon-day, or darkness at midnight, and that one is clearly and palpably distinguishable from the other; but still, when we watch the transitions of the twilight, we are puzzled to draw the demarcation between them. It will be sufficient to determine these perplexing questions when they occur. Here they do not present themselves. We have the deliberate judgment of the legislature, unaltered for thirty years, that not less than thirty nor more than ninety days, at the election of the plaintiff, is long enough for the existence of the execution. Whatever, then, is added by way of suspending the execution altogether, to the prejudice of the contract, is clearly proved by the law itself to be relief, and not remedy; and it can not puzzle any ordinary capacity, to see the difference between the two, more than it does to discern the difference between light and darkness. *27 It has been said that this decision will jeopardize the settled rights of years, and not only annul replevin bonds, but all sales made under them. According to principles heretofore settled by this court, such events can never happen. It is decided, that none but the creditor can take advantage of the objection; that as to defendants, such bonds and sales are good, and as creditors have a right to waive their constitutional privileges, if they adhere to replevin bonds and recognizances, and effectuate them, they are also bound by them, and are afterwards estopped to say they are void. Such is the conclusion to which my mind has come, on this litigated question, after the most mature deliberation and reseach, and I am bound by my oath and official duty to express it. I am free to confess that it is different from the opinion, which, when yielding without investigation, to the practice of the day, I once entertained. To adhere to an error when convinced, is odious; to retract it is praiseworthy and magnanimous, and I hesitate not to choose the latter course. The following petition for re-hearing, was presented, in both the preceding cases, by George M. Bibb, Esq. In this opinion of the court, the meaning of the words in the federal constitution, "no state shall pass any ex post facto law, or law impairing the obligation of contracts," is discussed. Although this subject was elaborately argued at the bar, and the judges have delivered their opinions seriously, and separately, I hope to find an apology with the court, as sufficient as it is in my own mind, for moving a re-consideration. The following positions are, in substance and effect, taken by the court: 1st. That the prohibition alludes to the civil, and not the natural and moral obligation of contracts. 2d. That right and remedy are the same thing, without distinction, and that the want of remedy is the want of right. 3d. That the legal and civil obligation of a contract, consists in the remedy allowed by law for breach. 4th. "It is the remedy allowed by law in force at the date of the contract, being on the faith of which the contract was made, which constitutes its obligation." 5th. That a law made after the date of the contract, which gives a more speedy and efficacious remedy to the creditor, is not prohibited; but if the remedy be made more favorable to the debtor, the law is void. 6th. That the law in question in relation to executions, is void or not void, at the election of the creditor, although contrary to the constitution of the United States; but is obligatory upon the debtor and securities in the replevin bond, and can, at the election of the creditor, give to replevin bonds the force of judgments. 7th. That the laws of the states and the United States, adopting the execution laws of the several states, and the execution of the laws modifying remedies ever since the year 1789, are not evidence of the true construction and meaning of the constitution. *28 The abridgment of the powers of legislation, not only of this state, but of all the states; the effect of such abridgment of legislative power upon the states; the reaction upon the federal government; the restrictions upon the power of the people to consult their happiness, and provide, by the accustomed and ordinary acts of legislation, for the exigencies of war, famine, pestilence and other cases of extraordinary scarcity and distress, are pregnant consequences of the construction of the constitution contained in those opinions, should such construction prevail. That a consolidated government over a very extended territory, can not be established upon the principles of a free republic, or if so established in form, will soon degenerate in fact into monarchy or tyranny, is an opinion advanced by most political writers. The present condition of the governments of the earth, and the history of all former governments, furnish alarming proofs to sustain that opinion. The division of power between the state governments and the federal government is an experiment of these United States, to profit by the examples of all former governments, to avoid their catastrophe. That a consolidated government over so vast a territory as that of the United States, would long remain a free republic, I do not believe. The subjects of legislation would be too diversified and complex, to be understood and provided for securely, by one legislature. The diversity of soil, climate and productions, habits and local necessities, would require a difference of legislative provisions adapted to the comfort and convenience of the parts. A single legislature would find it impracticable to legislate for the whole, otherwise than by conferring multiplied and uncontrollable discretionary powers on the executive departments. I firmly believe, that the loss of the internal powers of the state governments, will substantially convert the federal, into a consolidated government; that liberty will not long survive, except in name, such consolidation. Shall we profit by the mass of facts which history presents, or shut our eyes against the light of experience and truth? Shall we demolish the watch-towers, disarm the sentinels, open the gates to the enemy, and hugging the phantom of liberty, sleep in fancied security? These teeming subjects I do not propose now to discuss. They are beyond my powers--far beyond the limits of a petition. But I have suggested them for the consideration of the court. They are, in my estimation, sufficient of themselves, to induce a re-consideration of the opinions delivered. The constitution of Kentucky contains, in substance, the provision of the constitution of the United States in relation to contracts. The state constitution omits the word "obligation." The particular phrase of the constitution of the United States, under consideration, is thus: "No state shall pass any ex post facto law, or law impairing the obligation of contracts." *29 Retrospective or retroactive laws are not prohibited by this clause, unless they are to make that a crime, which was not so when the fact was committed, or annex a more grevious penalty, or unless the obligation of contracts is impaired. Bull v. Calder, Dallas, p. 386FNa1. Obligations other than those arising out of contracts, are not within the purview of this prohibitory clause. The constitution of the United States intended by this provision to regulate the comity and intercourse, not only between the several states, but also between the states and foreign nations; to establish the inviolability of contracts, wheresoever made. Contracts made in Kentucky or in Pennslyvania, in New York, Massachusetts or Maryland, in France or in England, in Europe, Asia, Africa or America, when sought to be enforced in the States, are all protected by the constitution of the United States. The principle thus inserted in the constitution, was not newly created; it was an universal rule of ethics, pre-existing, intrinsically just, and proper to be observed by all legislators; and being so just, it was therefore engrafted into the federal constitution. FNa1. The case of Calder & ux vs. Bull and wife, was this: On the 21st March, 1793, the court of probat for Hartford disapproved the will of Normand Morrison, and refused to record it. More than 18 months elapsed after the rejection of the will; so that, by the laws of Connecticut, all right of appeal was barred. Bull and wife, claiming under the will, and having no way, by the then existing laws of Connecticut, to get a new trial or re-hearing of the decision, petitioned the legislature of Connecticut; and thereupon, in May, 1795, the legislature passed a resolution, or law, setting aside the decree of the court of probat, of the 21st of March, 1793, and granted a new hearing before the said court of probat, with liberty of appeal therefrom in six months. A re-hearing was accordingly had, and the court of probat, in July, 1795, approved the will. On appeal to the superior court of Hartford, they affirmed the decree approving and recording the will. On appeal to the supreme court of errors of Connecticut, that court adjudged there was no error. The case was then carried to the supreme court of the United States, by Calder and wife, who claimed the property in right of the wife, as heiress of N. Morrison. It was contended, that this law of Connecticut was prohibited by the constitution of the United States; it was certainly a retrospective law; but the supreme court of the Union declared it no violation of the constitution of the United States. The universality of the contracts embraced by this provision, imposes a high and solemn duty to search the true and proper signification of the expression, ""obligation of contracts." The intention to provide by the constitution a rule of social intercourse between states, and of comity and civility between the United States and foreign nations, authorizes us to consult the opinions of the judges of other states, and of eminent jurists and writers upon the laws of nature and of nations. *30 1. The proposition assumed by the court, is, that the prohibition in the constitution of the United States refers to the civil, and not to the natural and moral obligation. Pothier, to whom reference is given in the opinion delivered, certainly divides obligations generally (not obligations of contracts), into those which are:--1st, Natural and civil; 2d, those which are civil only; 3d, those which are natural only. He says, a natural obligation "is that which in honor and in conscience binds him who contracted it, to the performance of it." "A civil obligation is a bond of right, vinculum juris, and which gives to the party to whom it is contracted, the right of requiring by law the performance of it." "Obligations are commonly both natural and civil. There are some, however, which are merely civil obligations, without being also natural, to the performance of which the debtor may be constrained by law, although they are not binding in conscience. Such is the obligation which results from a judgment erroneous in fact or in law, when the time within which it might have been reversed, is past; or from an unjust judgment from which there is no appeal. The decisory oath produces a like (civil) obligation. The defendant who has deferred it to the plaintiff, is bound by this to pay what is thus sworn to be due, although in truth and in conscience he does not owe it." Evans' Pothier, book 2, chap. 1, p. 107-8, n. 174. Such is Pothier's explanation of the mere civil obligation. It does not appear to my mind, a proper exposition of the constitution of the United States, to refer its prohibition to the mere civil obligation. It is not worthy of that instrument, to suppose that this inhibition to the states was intended to secure the performance of erroneous and unjust judgments, or duties which the defendant in truth and in conscience does not owe. It is more worthy of that instrument, to refer that sentence to the natural obligation of contracts, "which in honor and in conscience binds him who contracted it, to the performance." For it will be seen, by the very definition of a contract given by Pothier, and by all jurists, that every contract must have the natural obligation. The very definition of a contract, "includes a concurrence of the will of two persons at least, one of whom makes, and the other accepts, the promise." Evans' Pothier, art. 1, sec. 2, page 5. "Natural law is the cause mediately at least, of all obligations." Part 1, art. 8, sec. 3, page 76. To arrive at the conclusion, that it is the civil, and not the natural obligation, which is alluded to by the constitution, the opinion refers to the distinction between perfect and imperfect obligations; and it is asserted in the opinion, "that a civil or legal obligation is so denominated in contradistinction from that natural, but imperfect obligation depending on conscience alone." It is, moreover supposed a contract would fall under the denomination of imperfect obligation, if the force of remedy was removed. *31 With due respect for the court, I must be permitted to say, that such propositions are not according to the doctrine of Pothier, who is cited, nor according to the opinions of jurists and writers upon natural and political law. Pothier, in his first page, says, "Obligation has two significations; in its most extensive signification, lato sensu, it is synonymous with the term duty, and comprehends imperfect, as well as perfect obligations. We call imperfect obligations, the obligations for which we are accountable to God alone, and which give to no man the right of requiring the performance of them. Such are the duties of charity, of gratitude, of giving alms from our superfluities." In page 2d, he says, "The term obligation, in a sense more proper and less extensive, comprehends only perfect obligations, which are also called personal engagements, giving to him to whom they are contracted, the right of requiring the performance of them." "Jurists define these obligations, or personal engagements, a bond of right, binding us to another, to give, to do, or refrain from doing something. Vinculum juris, quo necessitate adstringimur alicujus rei solvendae." "The words, vinculum juris, are applicable to the civil obligation alone. The mere natural obligation, which is solius equitatis vinculum, is also, in a sense less proper, a perfect obligation; for it gives, if not a legal at least a moral right of requiring the performance of it, while the imperfect obligation does not give even that right." "A contract is a kind of agreement. To know what a contract is, it is previously requisite to know what an agreement is. An agreement, or pact (for these are synonymous terms), is the assent of two or more persons to form an engagement between them, or to dissolve or modify one already formed. The kind of agreement which has for its object to form some engagement, is what is called a contract." Evans' Pothier, art. 1, sec. 1, page 4. After stating the difference between the Roman and French law, he says that a contract ought to be defined "an agreement by which both parties promise reciprocally, or only one of them promises and engages to the other, to give, do, or refrain from doing something." By these definitions, as well as by reference to his treatise, part 2d, chap. 2d, pages 107 to 114, the difference between agreements and contracts, between perfect and imperfect obligations, is fully explained; and by his explanation, as well as by his definition of contracts, and also from the definition of contracts by other authors (hereinafter given) it will appear evident, that no contract can possibly be classed among imperfect obligations. In arriving at the conclusion, that the civil obligation is referred to in the constitution, the opinion declares, that "the obligation depending on conscience, is obviously beyond the reach of human legislation. It is an inherent attribute of the moral nature of man, and not the creature of civil institutions, and can neither be given nor taken away by human laws." *32 That this inherent attribute, called conscience, can not be extinguished by human laws, that it belongs to the moral nature of man, is readily admitted; yet it seems to me, that this inherent faculty of man, is ductile; that its judgment and perception of right and wrong may be greatly improved, quickened and invigorated, and again debased and blunted, by the aid of human institutions. Like other faculties of the mind, it may be improved, enlightened, directed and fashioned, within certain limits, by society and political institutions. The faculty is inherent; its perceptions and decisions depend mainly upon education. Many divines have advanced this doctrine. It is so explicitly declared by the learned and pious Bishop Watson, in his answer to Thomas Paine's "Age of Reason." We need only to look at the different judgments of right and wrong, or the wickedness or goodness of the same actions, approved or disapproved by conscience, in the different quarters of the globe, to convince us that political institutions, human laws and customs, do, in a great degree, influence the decisions of conscience. Polygamy is as much approved by conscience, in those countries whose religious and civil institutions tolerate it, as it is disapproved by us. The followers of the Crescent conscientiously believe they are doing Mahomet's service, in prosecuting the followers of the Cross. Religious crusades to retake the Holy Land, have been carried on for years, at an enormous expense of human life. In Europe, a Holy Alliance is formed against the right of self-government. In the United States, very different workings of conscience are to be found on the subject of slavery. And I can well understand, how very pious men, just and upright in their dealings, felt themselves absolved from all natural and civil obligations to British creditors, after they had paid into the public treasury, in paper money, the amount of their respective obligations, as authorized by law. That I may be fully understood upon this subject, I do not mean to say that the prohibition in the constitution is levelled exclusively against impairing the natural obligation of contracts. I am only combatting the position, that it is levelled exclusively against impairing the civil obligation. My firm opinion is, that it includes both the natural and civil obligations of contracts, when the cause of obligation is rightly understood. The natural obligation to perform our undertakings, is the active and moving cause of obligation. When that personal engagement between man and man, formed by mutual consent, which constitutes a contract, is not prohibited by the laws of nature, nor by the municipal law, and is evidenced in the manner allowed by the municipal law, it is then a contract obligatory by both natural and civil tie. The civil tie is a consequence of, and accessory to the natural obligation. The municipal law is passive, the natural law is active, in creating the obligation of a contract. In civil society, every agreement by which one man is engaged to another, to do or not to do a particular thing, not wicked nor depraved, and in a manner not forbidden nor disallowed by the municipal law, creates an obligation, natural and civil; natural, because it is done in pursuance of a man's natural liberty to engage and promise to his fellow-man; civil, because society has not, in that particular, restrained that natural right. Accordingly, Barbeyrac, in his note on Grotius, page 8, note 5, says, "the silence of the legislator sufficiently infers a positive permission of whatever is neither enjoined nor prohibited. Permission is as real an effect of the law, taken in its utmost extent, as the strongest and most indispensable obligation." *33 If the obligations, natural and civil, which are combined in contracts, be properly understood, it will greatly conduce to the right understanding of the clause in the constitution of the United States. By the opinions delivered, the words "vinculum juris," are translated, "legal tie," "chain of law." Mere natural obligation, as explained by Pothier, is mistaken. These mere natural obligations are explained by him to be, contracts prohibited by law, or disfavored; as the contracts of married women, infants, usury, gaming, &c.--See Pothier, p. 114 to 117, part 2, chap. 2. They have confounded imperfect obligations with contracts prohibited or disfavored by the laws of society, and, therefore, wanting the civil obligation, as will be seen by consulting Pothier, part 2, page 117, and note 197, where he says, "we ought not to confound the natural obligations, of which we have spoken in this chapter, with the imperfect obligations mentioned in the beginning of this treatise;" and by these mistakes, have placed the whole force of obligation in remedy, by compulsive force in a court of justice. Necessity is made, judicial enforcing; action is made, suit in a court of justice, including execution. Let us then enquire, upon the authority of jurists, 1st, Whether compulsive force in a court of justice, is essential to create the civil obligation of a contract? 2d, What is meant by necessity? 3d, Whether action includes execution? 1st. Whether compulsive force is necessary to create the civil obligation of a contract? The United States authorizes the heads of departments to make contracts, and they do contract for and on behalf of the government, in the purchase of clothing, provisions, munitions of war, &c., to be paid for on delivery, according to written stipulations. Has this contract a civil obligation, or not, on the government? Grotius says, yes; yet it is clear, that no compulsive process of the law, lies against the United States. There is a right to require the performance on their part, in equity, and by a bond of right; but the requisition to performance can not be enforced judicially, by suit in court, or by execution. Grotius (book 2, chap. 14, p. 333) says, "A man may also be said to be civilly obliged by his own act, either in this sense, that the obligation arises, not from the mere right of nature, but from the civil right, or from both; or, in this sense, that an action in the civil law may lie against him. We therefore say, that from the promises and covenants which a King makes with his subjects, there may arise such a true and perfect obligation, as may confer a right upon him." "If the King engages himself, not as a King, but as any other person would do, the civil laws shall oblige him. But if they be done by him as a King, the civil laws do not affect him. Nevertheless, an action may arise from any of these acts, so far as to declare the right of the creditor; but no compulsion can follow, on account of the condition of the persons we are dealwith." *34 The reason why the contracts of the United States, made in pursuance of law by their agents, are binding, is that which I have before endeavored to explain; that contracts recognized and permitted by law, either expressly (as above) or silently and tacitly, which Barbeyrac says, in case of natural persons amounts to permission, do create civil obligations. 2. What is meant by necessity, in relation to the obligation of contracts? This obligation from necessity, is finely illustrated by Burlemaqui, in his Principles of Natural and Political Law, book 1, chap. 6, sec. 9, p. 43: "When we mention necessity, it is plain we do not mean a physical, but a moral necessity, consisting in the impression made on us by some particular motives, which determine us to act after a certain manner, and do not permit us to act, rationally, the opposite way. Finding ourselves in these circumstances, we say we are under an obligation of doing or omitting a certain thing; that is, we are determined to do it by solid reasons, and engaged by cogent motives, which, like so many ties, draw our will to that side. It is in this sense, we say we are obliged; for whether we are determined by popular opinion, or whether we are directed by civilians and ethic writers, we find that the one and the other, make obligation properly consist in a reason, which, being well understood, determines us absolutely to act after a certain manner, preferable to another. Hence, the whole force of this obligation depends upon the judgment by which we approve or condemn a particular manner of acting. For to approve, is acknowledging we ought to do a thing; and to condemn, is owning that we ought not to do it. Now, ought, and to be obliged, are synonymous terms. We have already hinted at the natural analogy between the proper and the literal sense of the word 'obliged,' and the figurative signification of the same term. Obligation properly denotes a tie. A man obliged, is, therefore, a person who is tied. Such is the nature of primitive and original obligations." Grotius (book 1, sec. 9, p. 8), speaking of right, says there is also a third sense of the word right, according to which it signifies the same thing as law, when taken in its largest extent, "as being a rule of moral action, obliging us to that which is good and commendable." 3. Does action include execution? Action is defined, "a legal demand of one's right." Action is nothing else than "loyale demande de son droit"--lawful demand of one's right.--Co. Litt. 235. Action is nothing else than the right of prosecuting to judgment that which is due to any one. Action continues only till judgment; execution begins where action ends.-- Litt. sec. 504; Co. Litt. fol. 289. A petition and summons is a legal demand of one's right. A petition to the government is a legal demand of one's right.--3 Black. Com. p. 256. An entry into one's land, where right of entry is given, is a lawful demand of one's right. A continual claim, is a lawful demand of one's right. A request personally made by the creditor, of his debtor, for payment, is a lawful demand of one's right. *35 Now, all these, or any one of them, do not constitute the obligation, or bond of right. The right existed before it was lawful to make the demand. The definition of the obligation of a contract, as given by the court, does not seem to be conformable to that of Grotius, Burlemaqui, nor of Pothier. The right "of judicially enforcing the performance of it," is not requisite. As is seen by the cases of contracts by the government, or of the King, the right in law, to require the performance, to ask the performance, to petition for the performance, to claim in honor and conscience the performance, is sufficient. Pothier's definition and that of Grotius, substantially agree. Pothier says, "a bond of right, vinculum juris, and which gives to the party to whom it is contracted, the right of requiring by law the performance of it; not of judicially enforcing the performance of it. That is only one of the modes of legal, or lawful requisition." Barberac, in his note on Grotius, page 3, note 16, says: "When a merchant has sold his goods to his King, the King is as much obliged to pay for them, on the terms, and at the time agreed on, as the meanest purchaser." II. The second position is, that right and remedy are the same, without distinction or difference, and where there is no remedy, there is no right. III. That the obligation of a contract consists in the remedy allowed by law for breach of contract. IV. That "it is the remedy allowed by the law in force at the date of the contract, being that on the faith of which the contract was made, which constitutes its obligation;" that the court is no part of the remedy; but that the execution permitted at the date of the contract, is a part of the remedy, and of consequence a part of the contract. These three propositions may be considered together. It is respectfully suggested, that the court have mistaken effect for cause. Remedy is the effect and consequence of obligation. Obligation is the cause of remedy. A contract, obligatory by its terms upon the parties, must have existed before action sued; and the breach of that obligation is the cause of remedy. The action is not the cause of the obligation. If a contract has been made in another country, and is brought here to be enforced, that contract brings with it here, its obligation. If it had no obligation when it came here, it acquired none by being brought here. The obligation is personal; it follows the person every where; it is not local, but transitory. The obligation is the same in every civilized country, however the remedies allowed in different countries may vary. In Viner's Abridgment, title Contract and Agreement, letter A,, vol. 5, p. 504, that learned jurist has explained his idea of obligation, and it seems to me in direct hostility to the positions taken by the court. "A contract (he says) is an agreement entered into by several persons, inducing an obligation by its own nature; and the obligations arising from contracts are divided and distinguished according as they are perfected, either by the sole consent of the contractors, or by the intervention or tradition of things, or lastly, by word or writing; and are either ex re, from a thing done; ex verbis, from words; ex literis, from writing; or ex consensu from consent. But as all obligations can not be bound up under general and regular names of contracts, the law allows some obligations to pass under the name of quasi contractus, because we have some resemblance, and are of the nature of contracts." *36 He says, "a forced agreement of the party is accounted to be no agreement, and, therefore, the court will not compel him who did thus agree, to perform his agreement; for the law abhors all force and violence. Ibid, page 505. This shows that obligation must precede the action on it. The expression, "inducing an obligation by its nature," shows that this obligation is perfect, before breach of the contract. Breach, and remedy for breach, are consequences of the obligation so superinduced by the very nature of contract. In the enumertion of the causes of obligation arising from contracts, "divided and distinguished according as they are perfected," remedy is not mentioned as any cause of the perfection of the obligation. The obligation must be perfect, before the person is bound to perform; and if not perfect, the law will not compel the performance. Where there is a want of right, there ever should be a want of remedy; and we may say, truly and justly, that the want of right and the want of remedy, are the same thing; for remedy is the effect and consequence of right. But the court have applied the converse of this proposition, and have said that where there is no remedy, there is no right. In the case of the  Commonwealth v. M'Gowan, 4 Bibb 62, this court declared that a right had existed in the Commonwealth from the years 1800 and 1801, until the year 1809, without a remedy. These expressions are to be found in that opinion: "Although the right existed in the Commonwealth against the defendant, to the money which had been thus improperly drawn from her, yet it was not until 1809, that the remedy to recover it was specially given. By that act (that is, the act of 1809), such a remedy is provided. The right existed before, but without such special remedy." And by that opinion, such want of remedy vested in any one to sue for that right, until the act of 1809, gave it, was one sufficient reason to prevent the statute of limitations from attaching, although the right vested in the Commonwealth from 1801. In this same case, page 65, it is declared, that the statute of limitations operates only upon the remedy, in personal actions, and not upon the right. In  Graves v. Graves' executor, 2 Bibb 208, the court adjudged, "that the statute of limitations does not affect the validity of the contract, but the time of enforcing it; or, in other words, it does not destroy the right, but withholds the remedy." The cases of  Grubbs v. Harris, 1 Bibb 567, and  Rearden v. Searcy's heirs, 2 Bibb 202, were decided upon the distinction between right and remedy. These cases, decided in the court of appeals, had settled the distinction between right and remedy, as the law of this court, from 1809. The distinction between right and remedy is acknowledged and adjudged in so many other cases in the United States, in England and France, and sustained by the opinions of such eminent jurists, that to cite them all, would appear like a pedantic parade of authority. Some of them, however, I beg leave to refer to. *37 Dixon's executors v. Ramsay's executors, was decided upon this distinction between right and remedy.  3 Cranch 319. In  Sturges v. Crowninshield, 4 Wheaton 200, the supreme court of the United States, in discussing this very sentence of the constitution, say, in the opinion delivered by Chief Justice Marshall, "the distinction between the obligation of a contract and the remedy given by the legislature to enforce that obligation, has been taken at the bar, and it exists in the nature of things. Without impairing the obligation of the contract, the remedy may certainly be modified as the wisdom of the nation shall direct."FNa1 FNa1. "The insolvent laws of many, indeed of by far the greater number of the states, discharge the person of the debtor; but leave his obligation to pay, in full force. To this the constitution is not opposed."--Opinion continued, p. 203. Nash v. Tupper, 1 N. Y. Term Rep. 402,  Lodge v. Phelps, 1 John. Cases 140, and Pearsoll v. Dwight, 2 Mass Rep. 88, are all decided upon this very distinction between right and remedy. That learned author, Huberus, after stating very clearly that the lex loci is to determine the effect and essence of the obligation, says, that the limitation of the country where suit is brought, and not of the country where the contract is made, must govern; that if a debtor, resident of Friesland, executes an instrument in Holland, before a magistrate, which may there entitle him to an execution, but not by common right, no execution can issue here; but the merits of the original demand must be examined. "The reason is that acts of limitation and modes of execution, do not belong to the essence of the contract, but to the time and manner of bringing suit, which is a distinct thing. Haec est ratio quod prescriptio et executio non pertinent ad valorem contractus, sed ad tempus et modum actionis instituendoe; quoe per se, quasi contractum separatumque negotium, constitit." See the whole translation, 3 Dallas, 370-3. The case of Smith v. Spinola, 2 Johnson 198, was decided upon this distinction between right and remedy, between the obligation of a contract and the mode of redress for a breach of it. Spinola, of the island of Madeira, made a contract there with a subject of the King of Portugal. By the laws of Portugal, in force in Madeira, the body of the debtor could not be arrested; the only remedy there, was against the property. Upon this contest, Spinola was arrested and held to bail, in New York. He moved to be discharged on common bail, and to have an exoneretur entered on the bailpiece. The court declared that the law of the place applied to the obligation and interpretation of the contract, but that the remedy was to be had according to the law of New York, and therefore, refused to discharge his person. If the court desire more authorities on these points, I refer them to Day's Ed. of Co. Litt. vol. 3, note 44, on sec. 104, and fol. 79b.; Ord on Usury, note a, p. 32. *38 They will find, in the note of Hargrave and Butler, before referred to, all the authorities arranged under these two heads: 1st, That as to the construction of the contract, the lex loci must govern; 2d, that the remedy must be according to the lex fori. It is stated clearly, by the highest judicial authority, and by the opinions of the most distinguished jurists and civilians, that the right derived from contract is transitory and follows the person everywhere, from country to country; but that the remedy must be according to the law of the forum to which application is made, and in conformity to the rules prescribed by the laws of that country. This transitory right is wholly inconsistent with the obligation of a contract, as defined in the opinion of this court, now under consideration. The natural obligation of contracts must be the same in every country; it is founded in the same natural right to contract. The civil obligation consists only in the want of restraint upon the parties to make the contract; implies an assent of the political society to that contract; and, interpreted according to the rules and regulations of the body politic, is only an accessory to the natural right and obligation. That civil obligation attaches and unites itself at once to the contract. Being the assent of the sovereign power to its validity, that assent which constitutes the civil obligation, likewise follows the person from country to country. Upon this basis of natural and civil obligation of contracts, it is easy to see, that a contract can have the same obligation everywhere; that the obligation follows the person from country to country, not being clogged with an particular form or remedy for breach of it. The dissimilarity of the modes of redress by mesne process, judgment and execution, in different countries, has no effect in varying the obligation of the contract. Suppose an act of the legislature of one of the United States should declare, that no contract thereafter made in any foreign country, should have any obligation upon any part to it, if found within the territory of that state; but that he should, upon entering the territory, be forever acquit and discharged; would not such an act be a violation of the constitution of the United States? It seems to me, that it would violate that international principle, which was intended by the constitution of the United States; because the contract, if permitted and acknowledged by the lex loci contractus, had, instanter, an obligation, "by its ??own nature," which followed the person into the state; which obligation comes under the protection of the constitution of the United States, secured against annihilation. If the remedy existing at the date of the contract, and allowed by law, constitutes its obligation, "being that on the faith of which the contract was made," as asserted in the opinion, that remedy must follow the contract wherever the party goes; it must be as transitory as all jurists say the right derived from the contract is. If this remedy does not, or can not follow from country to country, then the obligation either ceases when the party goes into another country, or the obligation changes with such change of country; it ceases whilst the debtor is in a desert, or it is dead whilst he is on the high seas. Again, when he touches the shore, it rises, like a Phoenix, from the ashes of the dead. It is like the Camelion; it is like Proteus; it is like anvthing or nothing. *39 If the remedy existing at the date, is a part of the contract, then the rule docket must be revived, to suit those contracts made before the rule docket was abolished; the remedy by appeal and writ of error attaches; the alteration of the limitation for writs of error, from five to three years, can only operate upon contracts made after the new limitation to writs of error; and this court has, in one instance, if not more, applied the limitation of three years instead of five. Mesne process is as much a part of the remedy, as final process. By the opinion delivered, the force, which, in a state of nature, might be used by the one party to exact performance of the perfect obligation, constituted the remedy. The party entitled to use force, in a state of nature could choose his time and manner of exerting that force; he could modify it at his will and pleasure. For this right to use individual force, the aggregate force of society is substituted. The individual right to use force, to forbear, and to modify his force from time to time until performance is exacted, is surrendered to society. How has the individual acquired the right to deny to society the modification and exertion of their aggregate force, from time to time, according to their wisdom and discretion? When any contract is made, it must be known, that whatever laws then exist, are, by the very political compact, liable to be changed. One legislature can not bind their successors. "The duration of law, in general, as well as its first establishment, depends on the free will and pleasure of the sovereign, who can not reasonably tie up his own hands in this respect. As the state of things may happen to alter in such a manner, that the law, grown useless or hurtful, can no longer be put in execution, the sovereign can, and ought, in that case, to repeal and abolish it. It would be absurd and pernicious to society, to pretend that laws once created, ought to subsist forever, let what inconveniency soever arise. Burlemaqui, book 1, chap. 10, sec. 14, p. 76. Such are the doctrines of Burlemaqui, in his celebrated disquisition on Natural and Political Law. These are consequences deduced from that benevolence, goodness and wisdom, to provide for the whole, which are the true foundation of the powers of government. Chap. 9, p. 63 to 66. If the individual has surrendered his right to use force, and the sovereign is bound by goodness and wisdom to alter the laws when they are hurtful, and can not tie his own hands in this respect, how has the individual acquired the right to tie the hands of the legislature in this respect? The court say, by the power of contracting, one with another; that by individual contracts, the hands of the legislature are bound up, so that they can not modify execution laws, from time to time, according to their wisdom, because the remedy existing at the date of the contract is a part of the obligation; right and remedy are one and the same, and no state can pass any law impairing the obligation of contracts. *40 But Huberus Emerigon, and the most distinguished jurists and civilians of Europe, the courts of Massachusetts, of New York, of Kentucky, and the supreme court of the United States, say, the modes of execution form no part of the contract; the distinction between right and remedy exists in the nature of things; the remedy may be changed and modified, without impairing the obligation of contracts. According to the opinion of the court, the civil obligation consists in the remedy. Now, no action can accrue, until breach of contract. Has a contract, then, no civil obligation, until it is broken? If it has, in what does it consist, before breach? Is it the promise or expectation of remedy, in case it be broken? Can or does the political frame of government of Kentucky, or of the United States, promise that laws shall be perpetual or immutable? Do not the very annual meeting of the legislature, and the constitutional form of government, declare that the laws may be changed annually, or at the will of the legislative body, with the assent of the executive? It seems to me, that the most which can be made out of that view of the subject, is, that we must repose a general and salutary confidence in the legislature, that some remedy will be provided, modified, moulded and adapted to the state of things, and the changes in human affairs; but that no particular remedy is guaranteed. Remedy is solely a subject of legislative discretion. To suppose that a government will not provide remedies for injuries, is to suppose a nation of barbarians. To deny the right to modify these remedies from time to time, as experience and exigencies shall require, is to deny the right to improve and ameliorate the conditions of society--saps the very foundation, and obstructs the very intent of the social compact. The court say, if the legislature can pass a replevin law of two years, they may for one hundred years. To deny the use of power, because it may be abused, is not considered a fair argument. Judge Iredell thought that mode of argument not to be indulged, in relation to legislative power. His objection to that mode of argument is very clearly, but succinctly and forcibly stated in the case of Calder and wife v. Bull and wife, 3 Dallas, p. 400. "We must be content to limit power, where we can; and where we can not, consistently with its use, we must be content to repose a salutary confidence." The legislature might retort the argument of the court, and say, if the judges have the power to declare a law void, because they think it unconstitutional, they may put a stop to all legislation that does not accord with their notions of policy. V. The opinion of the court, in effect, asserts, that a law made after the date of a contract, giving a more speedy or more efficacious remedy to the creditor, is not a violation of the obligation of contracts; but that the replevin law in question is, because it gives a more tardy remedy than that which existed at the date of the contract sued on. *41 This position is the result of the answer given to the cases of  Grubbs v. Harris, 1 Bibb., 567, and  Rearden v. Searcy's heirs, 2 Bibb., 202; and is, moreover, in express terms, to be found in the opinion of one of the judges. In the case of Grubbs v. Harris, the question was upon the right of the creditor to sue his debtor by petition and summons, upon an obligation entered into before the passage of an act of assembly giving that summary and more expeditious remedy. The court, consisting of Judges Bibb, Boyle and Wallace, sustained the remedy. These reasons are given by the court: "The statute does not change the essence of the contract; it is the mode of recovery which is changed. If the proper distinction is observed, between those laws which have reference to the essence, nature, construction or extent of a contract, and those which have reference only to the mode of enforcing them, the question will be plain." "The lex temporis contractus must be regarded, in giving a decision upon the essence and nature of a contract; the laws existing at the time of seeking to enforce the contract, must govern and determine the kind of suit which may be brought. The means afforded by the laws for enforcing a contract, in case of breach or non-compliance, make no part of the contract. If the parties to the contract act in good faith, they intend to perform the stipulations, and therefore can not be supposed to have stipulated for dilatory proceedings in a suit for enforcing the contract. That personal contracts, which were just and lawful when entered into, according to the laws of the land where they were made, may be enforced, according to the true intent and meaning of them, notwithstanding a change of residence of the debtor, into a country whose judicial forms of proceeding are peculiar and dissimilar to those prevailing or allowed, according to the lex loci contractus, is a principle of justice, as well as of social policy, which has ever prevailed amongst civilized nations. It is no plea for the debtor, to say the contract can not be enforced by the same form of law that prevailed in the country wherein he contracted. The reason is, the modes of bringing suits and of execution, are distinct from, and make no part of the contract itself. They do not enter into the essence of the contract. So, the forms of suit and execution in our own country, at this time or at that, make no part of the contract, at the one time or the other; and the legislature are at liberty to adopt this or that mode of enforcing contracts, which the circumstances of the country may suggest as expedient. They are not bound to continue the same forms, and same system of courts and of proceedings in suits, for the accommodation of debtors or creditors." These principles accord with those expressed by the courts of Massachusetts, New York, of the supreme court of the United States, and of Huberus, before cited, and are fortified by many decisions in England. *42 In Reardon v. Searcy's heirs, land was sold under execution, upon a contract made before the passage of the act subjecting lands to execution, but before the amendment thereto, which made the distinction between contracts before and after the 17th December, 1792. This sale was declared valid. The court, composed of Judges Bovle. Wallace and Clark, declare, in that opinion, that the act of 1792, subjecting lands to execution for debts before contracted, was not unconstitutional. The reasons are thus expressed: It is certainly a well settled rule, that the law at the time a contract is made, composes a part of the contract, so far as relates to the nature and construction of such contract; but it is equally well settled, that the remedy to enforce such contract must be according to the law in force at the time such remedy is sought. Contracts are not made with an eye to the laws that shall enforce them, or to what property shall or shall not be liable to execution; but with an expectation of each party's performing, with good faith, what he has stipulated to do." In  Graves v. Graves' executor, 2 Bibb, 208, it appeared by the pleadings, that both parties lived in the state of Virginia when the contract sued on was made, and continued to reside in that state more than five years after the contract fell due; whereupon it became a question, whether the Virginia statute of limitations, or that of Kentucky, should be applied. The court declared, that the limitation of Virginia did not apply, but that of Kentucky. In coming to that conclusion, they say, "With respect to the nature and construction of contracts, and the rights and obligations of parties, arising out of them, the principle is well settled, that the law of the place where the contracts were made, is to govern; but with regard to the remedy, the law of the country where the contract is sought to be enforced, ought to be the rule of decision." I beseech the court to consider whether these three decisions, by this court, so solemnly asserting and reasserting that those rules were well settled, pronounced in times when the surface of society was smooth; when the political bark was unagitated; when there was no rage of conflicting elements to drive reason from the helm, were not competent, of themselves, to settle these rules? Whether they ought not to be considered main-stays in the exercise of your judicial discretion? I entreat you to examine the opinions of other judges and jurists referred to, and say whether those rules, so asserted in those three opinions, were not, and are not well settled by the concurrent opinions of distinguished jurists in Europe and America? How do those rules, so settled, comport with the positions now asserted in the decision under consideration, "that right and remedy are the same thing; that the remedy at the date of the contract, is a part of its obligation; that men contract on the faith of existing remedy; that the legislature can not modify the remedy of execution, and apply such modification to pre-existing contracts?" *43 In the opinions under consideration, the rules asserted in those former opinions are overturned and swept away by the passing remarks, that the petition and summons law was an additional remedy, and the act subjecting lands to the payment of debts before contracted, was a more efficacious remedy; "and on the supposition that the obligation of a contract consists in the remedy, it is most manifest, that neither of these acts could impair that obligation."  "Whatever may be said of the reasoning of the court in the opinions delivered in those cases, (Grubbs v. Lipscomb and Rearden v. Searcy's heirs), the decisions are evidently correct, and perfectly consistent with the idea, that the obligation of a contract consists in the remedy allowed by law to enforce it." In the opinion delivered by the second Judge, it is directly declared, that the petition and summons law, and law subjecting lands to the payment of debts before contracted, did not impair the obligation, because the change produced in the remedy by each of those acts, was not less tardy nor less beneficial to the plaintiff, than the pre-existing remedy; "and it is impossible to perceive how the obligation of contracts can be impaired by either accelerating the remedy, or by making a fund subject to their satisfaction, which was not so when the contracts were made." But in the cases of Blair and Williams, and Lapsley and Brashears, the law is void, because the remedy is more favorable to the debtor. The base and foundation of the decisions under consideration, is, that the remedy existing at the date of the contract, "being that on the faith of which the contract was made," constitutes its obligation; "the legal obligation of contracts consists in the remedy which the law affords;" that "the want of right and want of remedy are the same thing." To impair, is to weaken, to injure, to destroy. The decision asserts, that the remedy existing at the date of the contract, may be destroyed, provided another remedy, more beneficial, speedy and efficacious to the creditor or plaintiff, is given; but if the new remedy proposed to be substituted by the destruction of the old, is more tardy or favorable to the debtor, it impairs the obligation of the contract, and the law is void. Thus, the constitution protects creditors, but not debtors!!! Is such a construction the true one? The proposition is certainly new, and never before advanced by the most strenuous advocate of this clause in the constitution.FNa1 Let us examine it seriously. Suppose the legislature should say, by after laws, that debts upon written contracts, expressing on their face to be payable in one year, should be payable in three months; this would certainly be more speedy and beneficial remedy for the plaintiff. Suppose they should say, that obligations on their face for twenty dollars, should not be discharged, but by the payment of one hundred dollars; this also would be more beneficial to the creditor; but each more onerous to the debtor. Would not the obligation of those contracts be violated, impaired, injured, destroyed? I think they would; because every contract, ex vi termini, includes "a concurrence of the will of two persons at least, one of whom makes, and the other accepts, the promise. Evans' Pothier, art. 1, sec. 2, p. 5. FNa1. Counsellor Daggett, in his argument against the validity of the state law, in the case of  Sturges v. Crowninshield. 4 Wheat., 131, says, "a law declaring that debtors might be discharged, on paying half the sum due. or that a creditor might recover double the sum due, are alike void." *44 "A contract is a transaction in which each party comes under an obligation to the other, and each reciprocally acquires a right to what is promised by the other." Powell on Contracts, p. 6-7. A contract is "an agreement, upon sufficient consideration, to do, or not to do a particular thing. First, there is an agreement, a mutual bargain or convention." 2 Black. Com. 442. If one party promises to pay twenty dollars, for the consideration given by the other, that other agrees to accept it in satisfaction of the thing sold, & c. he agrees to be content with that sum, and to demand no more. If the time of payment be fixed, the one promises to pay at that time, and the other promises to wait the time agreed. These are the obligations of the one party to the other. This reciprocity of obligation grows out of, and is essential to every contract. It is essentially necessary that each be bound; if the one party is bound, and the other not bound, it is not a contract. Comyn on Contracts, part 1, page 3. "In omnibus rebus quoe dominium transferunt, concurret, apertet; effectus ex utraque parte contrahentium; nam sive ea venditio, donatio, sive conductio, sive qualibet alia causa contrahendi, fuit, nisi animus uiriusque consentit, produci ad effectum Id quod inchoatur, non protest." Powell on Contracts, p. 8. It seems clear, then, that the law, in the cases above stated, would impair the obligation to wait the time, and to accept the sum specified, by which the creditor is bound to the debtor. Every bond or note, although signed by the one party only, by the acceptance of the other party, creates this mutuality and reciprocity of obligation. It is but the evidence of the contract, and is the assent of both, or neither is bound. If, then, the remedy existing at the date of the contract, constitutes its obligation, it seems, from the very definition of contract, that it is the mutual assent and agreement of both to abide by it. Each is reciprocally obliged to await and abide its terms; and the rights of the debtor would be as much violated by an after law, giving a more expeditious remedy, or an increase of the obligation, as the rights and obligation of the creditor would be violated by a more tardy and less efficacious remedy. This construction, securing the rights of both parties, is worthy of a constitution which intended to secure equal and impartial justice to all. VI. That an unconstitutional law is void, or not void, at the election of the creditor; that he may at any time quash a replevin bond taken under it; but that the debtor and securities are bound by it. If the law be void, it is as if it did not exist. The constitution of Kentucky provides and declares, that laws contrary to the bill of rights, or "contrary to this constitution," shall be void. The distinction between void, and voidable, is comprehensible; it is known to the laws; but how an act can be void, and not void, at the same time, is not intelligble. If the legislative enaction be void, null and ineffectual, I can not understand how it can give authority to sheriffs or constables to make a bond, contract or obligation binding upon any party, or give to a bond the force of a judgment, or give life, vigor or activity to any command or authority intended to be enacted as a law. An enaction of the legislature of Kentucky, contrary to the constitution of the United States or of this state, comes from the legislative chambers still-born, impotent as the dead; the concentrated power of the executive can not infuse into it life or animation, neither can the will or consent of a single member of the community. *45 That a law, good and valid, and operating on all, for the benefit of all, may, at the election of any citizen be waived and not insisted on by him, so far as his particular benefit is alone concerned, leaving all others to have their rights and benefits from and under it, is likewise intelligible. But if an enaction be void, all have the right and benefit of insisting that it is void. No one can, under the pretence of renouncing his right, renounce and take away the rights, benefits and constitutional privileges of others. A man may renounce his benefit arising under a valid law; but he can not renounce the constitution of his country; and claim rights and benefits resulting from an enaction of the legislature, contrary to that constitution; especially, if by such renunciation he attempts to affect and impair the rights of others. Can a law be void, and yet give efficacy to a bond, and convert it into a recognizance and judgment? Besides, the very obligation of a replevin bond depends on the authority conferred on the sheriff or other municipal officer who takes it; and by so taking it, to bind both, and all the parties. If he has no authority to bind the plaintiff, then the bond is not obligatory, for want of that mutuality and reciprocal obligation necessary to every contract. If the plaintiff is not bound by it, but can avoid it when he pleases, neither the principal nor securities are bound. A delivery bond not containing all the recitals necessary to give to it the effect of a statutory recognizance or judgment, may be good as a common law bond; because the sheriff or other officer seized under a valid law, his authority was not void; the law was not void which conferred his authority and bound the plaintiff and defendant by his acts; but the proceedings under a void law, can not be assimilated to that case. The validity of judgments, executions and replevin bonds, depends upon their conformity to law. If the judgment is erroneous and is reversed, the execution and replevin bond taken under it, fall with the judgment. If the execution does not pursue the law, it may be quashed and the replevin bond falls with the execution; if a defendant enters into a replevin bond, he is not thereby precluded from reversing the judgment or quashing the execution or bond, nor from resorting to a court of equity to impeach the merits of the original transaction-- Faught v. Byrne, Hard. 330. The reason is, judgment, execution and replevin bond, all depend upon their conformity to law, and all proceedings from judgment to replevin bond, are considered as proceedings against the will of the defendants; they are not new contracts. Upon several acts of parliament relating to appeals, gaming and usury, it has been repeatedly decided that judgments are not contracts; judicium redditur in invitum.--Biddleson v. Whytal, 3 Burr., 1548; Bush v. Gower, 2 Strange, 1043; Middleton v. Hole, Cro. Eliz., 588; Ord on Usury, p. 90; Barjeau v. Walmsley, 2 Strange, 1249. The validity of every replevin bond taken by a sheriff, must depend upon the question whether the law authorizes him to take it. For by the act of 1796,  1 Litt., 585, 2 Digest, 1137, "every obligation by any sheriff taken in any other manner or form" (than before described in that section) "by colour of his office, shall be null and void, except in any special case, any other obligation is or shall be by law particularly and expressly directed." If the law then under consideration be unconstitutional and void, the act does not authorize the sheriff to take the replevin bonds, and, therefore, by the express provision of the act above mentioned, those bonds are null and void. The position taken by the one Judge in his opinion, to obviate the confusion which is to arise from the decision in question, can not be maintained upon the principle of law; but all such replevin bonds must be void and not obligatory on any party, if the act be unconstitutional. The case of  Barbour v. Barnett, 1 Litt., 396, can not settle such a doctrine. There, no bond was taken by the sheriff; it was a sale of land, and the act is not declared to be void. Replevin bonds derive their whole force from the statute law. They are bonds instituted by law and must stand or fall by force of positive law. *46 VII. By the opinions, the laws and usages of the states, and of the United States, adopting the execution laws of the several states, and the execution of those laws modifying remedies ever since 1789, are not evidence of the true construction of the constitution, nor of the meaning of ""obligation of contracts." The acts of Congress have adopted the execution laws of the several states; they have to this day provided no other. The first act regulating process in the courts of the United States, passed the 29th of September, 1789. The act of 2d March, 1793, provided that the valuers appointed by the laws of the states, should be valuers on executions issued from the courts of the United States, and the marshal was required to summon them. Without going further for the operation of these acts of Congress, than to the state of Virginia, it will be found that in 1787, Virginia passed an act requiring property to sell for three-fourths of its value; that the sheriff was to summon the valuers; that if the property would not sell for three-fourths of the appraised value in ready money, the defendant might replevy for twelve months; if he would not, the property to be sold on twelve months' credit. This act continued until 1795, and was adopted by Congress. The rule against impairing the obligation of contracts was right and just, before it was inserted in the constitution, and it can not be supposed that Congress intended to violate this sacred rule, appearing in the constitution as a rule of right. But this argument the court attempt to answer by suggesting, that Congress is not restrained, although the states are, from impairing obligations; or that Virginia might have supposed the act could only operate upon contracts after made; or that Congress might have given it the same prospective operation. As to the supposition, that the law of Virginia was prospective, (that is, to operate only as to contracts thereafter made), the act upon its face precludes such a supposition.FNa1 FNa1. The act of assembly of Virginia, Session Acts, chap. 7, p. 11, begins thus: "Sec. 1. Whereas it is represented to the general assembly, that great injury has been sustained, both by the debtors and creditors within this commonwealth, by the operation of the present laws concerning executions: For remedy whereof, "Sec. 2. Be it enacted, &c., That so much of all and every act and acts of assembly, as empowers the sheriffs or other officer levying an execution on the goods or other estate of the debtor, to restore such goods or estate so taken, to the debtor, on his entering into bond with security, to pay the money or tobacco for which such execution was so served, and all costs, with lawful interest for the same, to such creditor, within three months, shall be, and the same is hereby repealed. "Sec. 3. And be it farther enacted?? That on all executions hereafter issued," &c., and provides for sales at three-fourths of the appraised value?? or a replevin for twelve months?? or if the debtor does not replevy, then for a sale at twelve months' credit. *47 The Congress and the President of the United States could not have been ignorant that British debts to a very large amount, contracted by the citizens of Virginia and of other states, before 1776, were to be collected through the federal courts; that this law of 1787 of Virginia, was made long after those contracts, and that those British debts were to be collected under the Virginia law of 1787, as to all those who were sued in the state of Virginia. Moreover, it is well known that during the embargo and non-intercourse laws, and during the war, the states passed remedial laws suited to the exigencies of the times, not prospectively, but to operate on contracts pre-existing. The state of Kentucky, as well as other states, passed two laws to protect the citizens who were upon military duty, from being subjected to judgment and execution whilst absent in the service of their country. It is evident, that the right of the states to apply remedial laws to pre-existing contracts, has been practiced upon ever since the adoption of the federal constitution; that these laws so regulating the remedies merely, have never been, until recently, adjudged repugnant to the constitution of the United States; that this exposition has been sanctioned by many of those who were the framers of the federal constitution, who were members of Congress when the state laws concerning executions were adopted for the federal courts, and by General Washington, who was President of the convention who framed the constitution, and President of the United States when the acts of Congress referred to were passed, and were approved by his signature. "Whensoever there is any dispute about the sense of what is written, the practice afterwards established, and the authority of the judicious, uses to be of great weight, which is also to be observed in holy scripture."--Grotius, book 1, chap. 2, sec. 9, page 44. In the Virginia convention, Governor Edmund Randolph, who was a member of the convention which framed the constitution of the United States, declared in debate, upon this very article of the constitution prohibitory to state legislation, "with regard to retrospective laws, there is no restraint."  FNa1 FNa1. See Virginia Debates, p. 339, and 3 Dallas. Judge Chase's opinion, p. 391-3: Judge Patterson's opinion, p. 397; Judge Iredell's opinion, p. 399 and 400. Upon the whole it seems to follow, upon the authority of eminent jurists-- That every contract which is not forbidden by the laws of nature nor of civil society, has the natural and civil obligation, at the very instant it is mutually assented to: That this obligation is the effect of the natural right to contract, so far as the laws of society have not restrained the natural right: That the civil obligation means nothing more than that general obligation which every one is under to abide by the laws of society: "That the fulfilling of covenants and agreements belongs to the law of nature: *48 From this foundation civil laws were derived:" "That human nature herself is the mother of natural law, which creates in us the mutual desire of society: And the mother of civil law is that very obligation which arises from consent; which deriving its force from the laws of nature, nature herself is the mother of natural law and the grandmother of civil law--Grotius' Preliminary Dis. sec. 16 and 17. So that natural law is the cause mediately of all obligation."--Evans' Pothier, p. 75. That the instant a contract is mutually assented to if permitted by the laws of nature, and not prohibited or disfavored by the civil law, it acquires, by its own nature, an obligation which is personal, and transitory with the person of the debtor, from country to country; and its obligation is the same in every country, however the remedy allowed by the civil institutions of the different countries may vary; because the forms of "suit," and of "execution," in this country or that, and at this time or that, form no part of the obligation of the contract. The constitution of the United States prohibits the states from making that a crime, which was not a crime when the fact was committed, or making it more penal; and from making that no contract, which was a contract when made; or making the terms of the contract greater or smaller, or otherwise than stipulated by the parties. Subject to these limitations and restrictions, the states have a right to pass retrospective laws, according to their prudence and discretion. That alternations in execution laws, process and courts, do not impair the obligation of contracts. A rehearing is most respectfully solicited. BIBB. But, on the 4th of December, 1823, the petition was overruled. NOTE.--The Reporter had intended to have given a catalogue of all the reported cases decided in America, in which a legislative act had been declared unconstitutional, on any ground whatever; but, on reflection, he has concluded that it would be less embarassing to the reader, to select the cases where the ground of the decision was, that the act declared void, impaird the obligation of some contract. 1. The first case he has met with, is Vanhorne's lessee vs. Dorrance, decided by the circuit court of the United States for the district of Pennsylvania, at the spring term, 1795, declaring an act of assembly the state of Pennsylvania, void. 2 Dallas, 304. 2. The next case is that of Fletcher vs. Peck, decided by the supreme court of the United States, in 1810, declaring an act of assembly of the state of Georgia, void.  6 Cranch, 87. 3. The State of New Jersey vs. Wilson, decided by the supreme court of the United States, in 1812, declaring an act of assembly of the  state of New Jersey, void. 7 Cranch, 164. 4. The case of Crittenden vs. Jones, decided by the supreme court of North Carolina, in 1814, declaring an act of assembly of that state, giving a stay of execution after judgment, on entering into bond with security, void. 5 Hall's Law Journal, 520. *49 5. Terrett vs. Taylor, decided in the supreme court of the United States, in 1815, declaring two acts of assembly of Virginia, void, so far as they impaired rights acquired under an executed contract.  9 Cranch, 43. 6. The Town of Pawlet vs. Clark, decided by the supreme court of the United States, at the same term, declaring void an act of assembly of the state of Vermont.  9 Cranch, 292. 7. Sturges vs. Crowninshield, in the supreme Court of the United States, 1819, declaring an act of assembly of the state of New York, void.  4 Wheat., 122. 8. M'Millan vs. M'Neill, decided by the same court, at the same term, declaring an act of assembly of the state of Louisiana, void.  4 Wheat., 209. 9. Trustees of Dartmouth College vs. Woodward, decided by the same court, at the same term, declaring an act of assembly of the state of New Hampshire, void. 4 Wheat., 518. 10. The Farmers and Mechanics' Bank of Pennsylvania vs. Smith, decided by the Supreme Court of the United States, in 1821, declaring an act of assembly of the state of Pennsylvania, void. 6 Wheat., 131. 11. The case of Green vs. Biddle, finally decided by the supreme court of the United States in 1823, declaring void two acts of assembly of the state of Kentucky.  8 Wheat., 69. 12. The Society for the propagation of the Gospel in foreign parts vs. the Town of New Haven, decided by the supreme court of the United States, at the same term, declaring void an act of assembly of the state of Vermont.  8 Wheat., 464. Ky.App. 1823. Lapsley v. Brashears 4 Litt. 47, 14 Ky. 47, 1823 WL 1229 (Ky.) END OF DOCUMENT
